The usual disclaimer: This text file was made as a back up of the of 
the actual hardbound docs so that the owner of the game might have a
backup! URK! Buy the game if you like it!
                                    ______
                          /           |  /   |
                         /__   /  \   | /   /|    /  /
                           / |/   |\  |/\  | | | /| /
                          /  |\ | |/  |  \ |/  |/ |/
                         /   |  | /   |   \|   |  |
                       \      __|__        \
                       |\       |                  /
                       |/        /          __|__ /__
                       |  |/ /_ /__ /_ |\ |   |     /
                       |  |  \    / \  | \|   |    /
                                 /        \   |   /

                          Fleet Operations Manual
             The manual for Rules of Engagement from Mindcraft

                This manual is a product of Skid Row-Amiga!
         All work done by Mictlantecuhtli, Stark, and the Corsair.

     This text file was also left computer unspecific for our comrades
          in the IBM scene (The Dream Team!) and Atari (EW! ICK!)

  "Let me tell you the story, bout the hole to hell, it used to be sacred,
the wishing well, but the well dried up, and the bottom dropped out, up
through the ground, you could hear the devil shout, hole to hell, I live
in a house on the bad side of town (Skid Row!), there ain't no people,
my friends don't come around, cause down in the basement, there;s a tiny
hole, you look through the top, it's gonna take you for a roll, hole to
hell."       -Agony Column

S                                 programmed by
K                               THOMAS R. CARBONE
I
D                           art direction & graphics
                               MAURICE MOLYNEAUX
R
O                                   music by
W                                  DAVE GOVETT

S                                music produced by
K                       GEORGE ALISTAlR SANGER, THE FAT MAN
I
D                                technical advisor
                                 MARK R. BRADSHAW
R
O                                    best boy
W                                  JAMES SHELTON

S                                  missions by
K                                HAYWOOD NICHOLS
I                               THOMAS R. CARBONE
D                               MAURICE MOLYNEAUX
                                  JAMES SHELTON
R
O                               manual written by
W                               MAURICE MOLYNEAUX
                                THOMAS R. CARBONE
S
K                                  designed by
I                               THOMAS R. CARBONE
D                               MAURICE MOLYNEAUX
 
R                             TABLE OF CONTENTS
O
W Contents

S Introduction
K          Designer's Notes                              1
I          About This Manual                             3
D          Getting Started                               4
           IBM/Tandy                                     4
R          Amiga                                         6
O          Atari ST/TT                                   6
W
  Part I:  A Shakedown Cruise
S          About the Tutorials                           7
K          Mouse Tutorial                                7
I          Keyboard Tutorial                            17
D
  Part II: The Story So Far...
R          Historical Briefing                          27
O          Coded Situation Orders                       29
W          Intelligence Reports                         30

S Part III: Mission Overview                            35
K
I Part IV: The CCSI Interface
D          Interface Basics                             46
           Controlling the CCSI                         47
R          Button Symbol Table                          47
O          A Sample Panel                               48
W
  Part V: The Main Panels
S          How to...                                    54
K          100          MAIN MENU                       54
I          101          GAME/MISSION                    55
D          300          MASTER SHIP CONTROL             59
           301          NAVIGATION                      63
R          302          COMMUNICATIONS                  81
O          303          TACTICAL                        94
W          401          SQUAD DEPLOYMENT               120
           304          DATA RETRIEVAL                 122
S 
K INTRODUCTION
I 
D TABLE OF CONTENTS                                                                           
        _____________________________________________
  
R Part VI: Tactics
O          Maneuvers                                   130
W          Fire Control Techniques                     132
           Tactical Use of Asteroid Fields             133
S          Damage Control and Outpost Repair/Resupply  135
K          Tactical Use of Self-Destruction            136
I          Surrender Tactics                           136
D          Forming Battle Groups                       137
           Forming With the Flagship                   139
R          Capturing Outposts                          140
O          Dealing With Non-Objective Enemy Ships      141
W 
  Part VII: The Builder
S          Overview                                    143
K          202           Captains                      144
I          203           Spacecraft Design             149
D          204           Enemy Races                   153
           205           Solar Systems                 160
R          206           Mission                       169
O 
W Part VIII: The Interlocking Game System              185

S Appendixes
K 
I          I           All About Fleet Commanders      187
D          II          Opposing Forces                 191
           III         FW Ship Stats & Parts List      196
R          IV          Missile Types                   201
O          V           Panel ID Numbers                202
W          VI          Importing Commanders,           203
                       Captains, Systems, etc.
S          VII         Mission Descriptions            205
K 
I 
D                                INTRODUCTION
  Designers Notes
R Back in 1989, when work on our previous game, Breach 2, had just commenced,
O we began thinking about writing a real-time spaceship combat game. Those of
W you familiar with our previous games know of our Universe series and that
  spaceship combat is not new to us.
S 
K What is new, however, is the initial approach. The Universe games were
I created as massive contests that covered many different aspects of
D spacecraft operation (mining, piracy, trading, planetary assault, and
  transport). We wondered about taking an opposite approach. Supposing some of
R these aspects of the Universe games were developed into full-fledged games
O in their own right, playable on their own, and then suppose that these games
W could also be linked together to form one huge game.
  
S This is the concept behind the Interlocking Game System (IGS). A standard
K specification was created and incorporated into what was then the current
I project, Breach 2. Of course, once Breach 2 was released, IGS remained more
D or less a concept, since there was no other game to link with.
  
R Rules of Engagement is that missing link. Boarding enemy vessels and
O assaulting alien outposts are the main ties to Breach 2. The games work
W seemlessly, one loading the other, to create a single, integrated playing
  experience. Of course, Breach 2 is not required to play Rules of Engagement,
S as the latter has automatic squad combat routines built in. However, these
K two games when combined represent our first step in creating the ultimate
I space game.
D 
  Naturally, everyone asks about future IGS modules. We do plan more in the
R future. Imagine having three, four, or more complete games working as one!
O That is our dream, and you can help to make it happen. If you have any
W suggestions, drop us a line. Let us know what adventures you would like us
  to plot a course for.
S 
K Engage Hyperdrive!
I Omnitrend Software, Inc.
D
  / | /  |\
R \ |/\  |/
O / |  \ |\
W                            SKID ROW page 1 
   
S INTRODUCTION
K 
I Design Philosophy
D Like most computer simulators, Rules of Engagement is a highly detailed and
  fairly complex program. An ordinary aircraft flight simulator can easily
R confuse the average gamer with its multitude of controls and options, and a
O real-time starship simulation could easily become even more complex because
W of the very nature of space and the laws of physics which apply. With fleets
  of starships travelling at greater than half the speed of light, combat
S zones with a diameter greater than 50 Earths, and an overall arena billions
K of kilometers on a side, a game like ROE could become hopelessly unwieldy.
I 
D However, although we attempted to be as realistic as possible wherever we
  could, our primary goal was to make an interesting and entertaining game.
R Real starship commanders, when and if they actually appear on the scene,
O will no doubt have to be highly trained: understanding doppler shifts and
W time-dilation at speeds approaching that of light, and have a keen knowledge
  of Newtonian mechanics. Obviously, this is a bit much to ask of the average
S gamer. After all, who wants to calculate acceleration rates for orbital
K injection around a planet or compensate for time slowing down as our ships
I approached lightspeed?
D
  Thus, certain "liberties" were taken with the game. There's no time dilation
R as ships approach lightspeed, and your ships' sensors use a "HyperScanner"
O field system in order to give you real-time updates on the positions of
W targets in your vicinity. All this was done to keep the game playable.
 
S In keeping with this simplification, it's logical to expect that, as
K computers become more and more advanced, on such hypothetical starships a
I commander would only have to tell the computer what he wanted and it would
D do it. After all, at velocities approaching 300,000 kilometers per second
  (lightspeed), human reflexes are thousands of times too slow to react to
R changes and threats. In reflection of this, in ROE the player operates all 
O aspects of the mission via a simple yet powerful computer interface. You
W have a great deal of control, but all the mundane details-like taking care
  that the antiproton to deuterium ratio in the engines is correct, and that
S the ship stays at the right distance relative to a target while you're busy
K firing the weapons-are handled automatically.
I 
D Even with this simplification, there's a lot to learn and understand. We've
  tried to make many of the ship's functions fairly automatic, allowing you to
R adjust various devices and settings when you become more familiar with them.
O Our design goal was to produce a full-featured, realistic, entertaining and
W easy to play game. We think we've succeeded. We hope you agree.
  
S                               SKID ROW page 2
K 
I                                INTRODUCTION
D 
  About This Manual
R In Omnitrend's "Universe" a potential Fleet Commander must first complete
O four or more years at a military academy and then spend more years rising
W through the ranks. The training received during this period is intensive, 
  covering everything from diplomacy, discipline, and tactics to technology 
S and astrophysics. The size of this manual should make it clear that we're 
K not about to try to give you this background training. While realistic in 
I many ways, Rules of Engagement is nowhere near as complex to play as a 
D real starship would be to command and control.
  
R This is not to say that you could just dive into the program and play the
O game successfully without first reading at least portions of this manual. 
W However, we also understand that most of you will not want to have to read
  all of the relevant sections of the manual prior to playing the game the 
S first time. So, to give you a general idea of how ROE is played, Part I 
K (the tutorial) takes you through a very simple beginner mission with 
I step-by-step instructions. In this way you'll get to play ROE right away 
D and also get some familiarity with the program that will assist you in 
  understanding the rest of the manual.
R 
O For those of you unfamiliar with other games in Omnitrend's "Universe," 
W Part II updates "The Story So Far...", which fills you in on the 
  background of the game, lists your overall operational orders and also 
S contains intelligence reports on enemies, etc.
K 
I Part III describes your goals, objectives and resources, what missions are
D and how they are played. Part IV documents the ROE interface
  system (CCSI), describing the design features and general theory of 
R operation. Part V continues in this vein, describing the controls and 
O panels in the game itself, documenting each and every button, readout 
W and display.
  
S Part VI describes tactics, techniques and strategies that may be useful in
K successfully completing your missions.
I 
D One of the most important features of ROE is that it allows you
  to design and build missions yourself. Part VII documents the "builder" 
R sections of the game and how the various editors are used to create new 
O missions or edit existing ones. Part VIII documents the Interlocking 
W Game System and how Breach 2 can be linked with ROE to make a larger game.
  
S Finally, there are the Appendixes, which document technical details,
K describe the supplied missions, etc.
I
D                               SKID ROW page 3

R Getting Started
O
W (FOR ALL SYSTEMS)
  
S Making Backup Disks
K We suggest that you make back-up copies of all the game disks prior to
I installation. In the event of an accident, you will be able to restore the
D original disk(s) from your back-up copy.

R Readme Files
O If there is a README.TXT file on your game disk 1, it will contain 
W important information and instructions that were not available at the 
  time this manual was printed.
S 
K IBM/TANDY
I 
D System Requirements
  IBM-PC, Tandy, or Compatible computer with at least 640K of memory, 2
R floppy drives or a hard disk, MS-DOS (or PC-DOS) 3.0 or higher, and CGA, 
O EGA, VGA, or Tandy compatible graphics. A Microsoft, Tandy, or compatible 
W mouse is optional. AdLib, SoundBlaster, and Roland MT-32/LAPC-1 sound 
  boards are supported. Extended memory (XMS) is supported.
S 
K Installing the Game Onto a Hard Disk
I Your game is shipped on either four 360K 5.25" disks or two 720K 3.5" 
D disks. Place disk 1 into either drive A or B. Type the letter of the 
  drive containing disk followed by a colon (Example: A:) and press Enter.
R Type ROESETUP and press Enter.
O 
W Installing the 5.25" Version Onto Floppy Disks
  Your game is shipped on four 360K 5.25" disks. If your two floppy drives
S are of different sizes (one 3.5" and the other 5.25"), it will be necessary
K to copy some of the game disks onto disks of another size. When playing the
I game, disks 1, 2 and 3 will be used in drive A. Disk 4 will always be used
D in drive B. If drive A is 3.5", you will need to copy disks 1, 2 and 3 onto
  3 3.5" disks. If drive B is 3.5", you will need to copy only disk 4 onto a
R 3.5" disk.
O 
W Once you have resolved any differences in the disk sizes, place game disk
  1 in drive A. Type A: and press Enter. Type ROESETUP and press Enter.
S 
K                               SKID ROW page 4
I 
D Installing the 3.5" Version Onto Floppy Disks
  Your game is shipped on two 720K 3.5" disks. If your two floppy drives are
R of different sizes (one 3.5" and the other 5.25"), it will be necessary to 
O copy some of the game disks onto disks of another size. When playing the 
W game, disk 1 will be used in drive A and disk 2 will be used in drive B. 
  If your drive A is a 1.2mb 5.25" drive, you will need to copy disk 1 onto 
S a 1.2mb 5.25" disk. If drive B is a 1.2mb 5.25" drive, you will need to 
K copy disk 2 onto a 1.2mb 5.25" disk. If either of your drives are 360K 
I 5.25", you will need to obtain the 5.25" version of the game.
D 
  Once you have resolved any differences in disk sizes, place disk 1 in 
R drive A. Type A: and press Enter. Type ROESETUP and press Enter.
O 
W Running the Game
  To play the game, type RULES and press Enter.
S 
K Memory Requirements
I Rules of Engagement requires almost all of the memory on a 640K computer.
D If you receive an error message indicating you do not have enough memory,
  here is what you can do:
R 
O 1) Be sure you are running the game from the DOS prompt. Running the game
W from within a file manager (such as Windows or Deskmate) may not leave
  enough memory for the program.
S 
K 2) Check the device drivers loaded in your CONFlG.SYS file. This includes
I RAM disks, disk caches, and sound drivers. You may need to remove some or
D all of your drivers. You will need to leave the mouse driver installed in
  order to use a mouse with the game.
R 
O 3) Remove all TSR (terminate and stay resident) programs such as Sidekick.
W 
  4) If you still receive the memory error, you may need to remove your mouse
S driver as well. Also, selecting the internal speaker as opposed to one of
K the sound boards will use less memory. Using the CGA graphics mode will
I also save on required memory.
D 
                                SKID ROW page 5
R 
O GETTING STARTED
W 
  Using Extended Memory (XMS)
S This game supports extended memory. In order for the game to use this
K memory, you must have an extended memory driver present. HIMEM.SYS from
I Microsoft and QEMM from Quarterdeck are examples of such drivers. Upon
D running the game, a message will appear to indicate the game is using 
  extended memory. The game will load data into this memory, reducing the 
R amount of disk access and thus speeding up the game.
O 
W AMIGA
  
S System Requirements
K Any Amiga computer with at least 1 mb of memory.
I 
D Installing the Game
  Place game disk 1 into drive DF0: and open up its window. Double-click 
R on the ROESETUP icon.
O 
W Running the Game
  Double-click on the icon labeled RULES.
S 
K ATARI ST/TT
I 
D System Requirements
  Any Atari ST or TT computer with at least 1 mb of memory and one
R double-sided drive. Supports improved colors on the STe computers.
O 
W Installing the Game
  Since your game is shipped on double-sided disks, be sure that your 
S drive A is a double-sided drive. Place game disk 1 into drive A and open 
K up its window. Double-click on the ROESETUP icon.
I 
D Running the Game
  Double-click on the icon labeled RULES.
R 
O                               SKID ROW page 6
W PART I: A SHAKEDOWN CRUISE
  
S About the Tutorials
K For your first mission, we recommend that you follow this tutorial in 
I order to familiarize yourself with the game screens and controls. The 
D tutorial is divided into two separate sections for mouse and keyboard use.
  If you are working with a system with a mouse compatible with this program,
R follow the mouse tutorial. If not, follow the keyboard tutorial. Also 
O please refer to page 47 for a table of special symbols used on some game
W buttons.
  
S        NOTE:  If you can use a mouse, the keyboard commands are
K        still useful, as you can mix and match, using a combination of
I        mouse and keyboard action to play the game.
D 
  The mission "A Shakedown Cruise" is included for use with this tutorial
R only. It has a very simple objective, extremely weak opposition, and is
O not intended to provide any real challenge. Rather, it is designed to
W provide you with an introduction to Rules of Engagement and how it is
  played. We recommend that you follow these instructions very carefully.
S It may be difficult (or impossible) to successfully complete the mission
K if you don't.
I 
D Mouse Tutorial
  Start Rules of Engagement according to the instructions for your computer
R (see Getting Started section).
O 
W When the credit roll has ended (or you have bypassed it by pressing a key
  during the "chronology"), you will arrive in the game itself and be faced
S with a computer interface panel labeled "GAME/MISSION 101", over which
K is a green bar labeled "MAIN MENU 100". An animated Federated Worlds Armed
I Forces logo appears at screen center. Along the top and left side of the
D screen are a series of control buttons, all colored magenta/purple. The
  first thing you need to learn about controlling Rules of Engagement is
R that the only "buttons" you can click on are magenta or blue (blue=cyan in
O IBM CGA). "Highlighted" buttons are the active items. A highlighted
W magenta button turns white, and a blue button/item turns cyan (in CGA the
  cyan items highlight to white).
S 
K        NOTE: In this mouse tutorial all on-screen buttons are listed in
I        boldface, capital letters, as in: "Click on the FIRE button..."
D        Panel labels are listed in capitalized non-bold text.
  
R                               SKID ROW page 7
O 
W Ignore the buttons across the top of the screen and under the BUILDER
  bracket. In this tutorial we are concerned only with the buttons under the
S GAME and NEW GAME brackets.
K 
I        Mouse button note: Whenever the instructions tell you to "click"
D        the mouse it refers to the left mouse button. If use of the right
         mouse button is required you will be told to "click the right
R        mouse button".
O 
W As you portray the Fleet Commander in the game, your first step must be to
  create your alter-ego. Click on the button labeled FLEET CMDR under NEW
S GAME to create a new Fleet Commander. The animated logo is replaced by a
K large item selector listing all existing Fleet Commanders (this box is
I probably empty). At the bottom-right of the selector are four purple
D buttons, one of which is labeled CREATE. Click on it. A small yellow and
  green (white and cyan in CGA) "usurper" box will appear, asking "Are you
R sure you want to create a new Fleet Commander?" Click on YES to continue.
O 
W Following a brief "Please stand by..." message, a larger box appears, this
  one featuring a picture of a Fleet Commander and a field for his/her name.
S Click on the NAME button and a text editing frame with a thin cursor
K appears in the FLEETCMDR NAME field. Type in the name of your choice (up
I to 18 characters-you can use the Backspace key to edit) and then click your
D mouse anywhere on the screen (or press the Enter/Return key on your
  keyboard). Your character is now named. Before actually creating the
R character, you will probably want to decide what he/she looks like.
O Clicking on the NEXT button cycles through the various options for your
W character's appearance. Men and women of several ethnicities are available.
  
S When you've selected an appearance, click on the box's CREATE button. The
K CREATE COMMANDER box disappears and you will now see your new
I character listed in the item selector, with the word "available" appearing
D to the right of his/her name.
  
R Now it's time to create a game. Click on the CREATE button under the NEW
O GAME bracket at screen left (not the "CREATE" button at the bottom of the
W screen). The contents of the selector will change to list available missions
  and Fleet Commanders. You must select a mission and a character in order to
S start a new game. Click on the name of the mission A SHAKEDOWN CRUISE so
K that it is highlighted, and then click on the name of your Fleet Commander
I to highlight him/her. At the bottom-right of the selector is a MAKE GAME
D button. Click on it.
  
R                               SKID ROW page 8
O 
W A usurper box will appear. Click on EDIT NAME and a text editing frame and
  cursor will appear in the GAME NAME field. Using the keyboard, type the 
S name "Tutorial", then click the mouse anywhere on the screen (or press the
K Enter/Return key on your keyboard). Finally, you will want to select a 
I mission difficulty. Make sure that the blue BEGINNER button is highlighted. 
D If it is not, click on it. (You must be on beginner level to follow this 
  tutorial as written!) Now click on the DONE button. You are returned to
R the main screen.
O 
W Click on the EXISTING button under the GAMES bracket. The selector will now
  list all existing game files. Make certain that the game TUTORIAL is 
S highlighted (click on its name if not), and then click on the PLAY button
K at the bottom-right of the selector. A "Please stand by..." message will
I appear. After a few moments, the screen will go black and then return 
D with an image of space. The mission title and author's name appear over a
  picture of a Federated World's Dreadnought. A moment later, the game 
R screen will appear.
O 
W Across the top of the screen is a bar with a number 300 at the far left.
  This "300 bar" is the main menu of your ship's computer interface and is
S present at all times during the game. It contains the buttons for 
K switching between various panels, controls for setting the game's 
I time-passage speed, damage readouts and the elapsed mission time clock 
D (CHRONO).
  
R Below the 300 bar is the DATA RETRIEVAL panel (numbered 304). This is your
O ship's computer, where you can check on the condition of your fleet, and 
W get background information on your mission, status, and data about the 
  Captains on the ships under your command and the enemy you face.
S 
K The current data display before you is the FLEET STAT readout. It lists all 
I of the ships under your command and their last reported status. The first 
D ship listed, identified as F01 ,is your own flagship (the FWS Yury Gagarin),
  a Destroyer. The other ships are: F02, a Scout (the FWS Explorer), and F03,
R a Destroyer (the FWS Tau Ceti).
O 
W Along the right side of the screen are buttons which will change the data
  displayed on this panel. Click on the BRIEFING button under MISSION. A
S written briefing appears, describing exactly what you must do to 
K successfully complete your mission.
I 
D                               SKID ROW page 9
  
S When you've finished reading the briefing, click on the first icon (a 
K sextant) in the 300 bar at the top of the screen. This will move from the 
I DATA RETRIEVAL panel to the NAVIGATION controls. Your mission requires you
D to capture enemy vessel EO1 (a scout) and destroy enemy ship E02 (a 
  transport). Both the enemy ships and your own ships appear in the map which
R dominates most of the panel. Each ship is indicated by a small arrow and 
O an associated number. When you first view the map, you will see only the 
W ship symbols. At the top of the map area are a series of buttons, only two
  of which, FWS and ENS, will be highlighted. If you click on the others 
S (STR=stars, AFD=asteroid fields, WAY=waypoints, OUT=outposts, and 
K PLN=planets), the map will then display those items as well (if any). The
I only items you are concerned with in this mission are ships and
D waypoints. All ships are already selected for display, so click on the WAY
  button above the map to see the system's one waypoint.
R 
O When you first see the map you are in "mix" mode, which shows the entire
W system. To center on your own ship, click on the LOCK-ON button at the right
  end of the TELEMETRY controls. The map will change and center on your ship,
S showing an area 47 million kilometers in radius.
K 
I In order to capture the enemy Scout ship, you must first intercept it. At
D screen left is a selector which allows you to probe, chase or intercept 
  anything in the polar system. The highlighted (white bar) item in the 
R list below the buttons for these functions indicates the current item. 
O Below this selector are buttons for selecting what type of item you are 
W interested in probing, chasing, etc. The default is ENS, for "Enemy Ships",
  and your target vessel should be highlighted, as it is the first of the 
S two enemy ships in the sector. Click on the PROBE button, and the list of 
K enemy ships is replaced by a scanner readout of the enemy ship
I in question. You now have your prey identified, and it's time to move in.
D 
  Click on the CHASE button. The I.D. number of the enemy ship (E01) will
R appear in the small readout to the right of the INTRCPT button, and the
O small sextant icon alongside the HELM controls (lower-left corner of the
W screen) will flash, indicating that your ship is in autopilot mode. Your
  ship is now moving in on the target at full speed, and will automatically
S match course and speed when it has caught up with it.
K 
I                              SKID ROW page 10
D 
  
R It will take approximately 2 to 3 minutes of real-time to intercept the 
O target. In the meantime, you'll want to send your other ships after the 
W enemy Transport. Click on the dish-antenna icon (second button from the
  left) on the 300 bar. This will switch to the COMMUNICATIONS panel (302).
S On this panel, you need to specify the order to send and the ship to 
K receive it. At the left-center of the screen is a selector labeled ORDER.
I Click repeatedly on the button until the order "DESTROY ENEMY SHIP" appears
D as the highlighted (white bar) item in the list. Now, click on the blue 
  ACKNOWLEDGE button, highlighting it. This will tell the Captain(s) to whom
R you are sending the order to send an acknowledgment when the order has 
O been obeyed.
W 
  Note that the FWS Explorer (F02) is the highlighted item in the SHIP 
S selector just below the ORDER box. You will notice that both of these 
K selectors are now linked to the larger selector to the right, which now 
I lists every ENEMY SHIP, and that a bar now connects this selector to a send
D order box in the lower left-hand corner of the screen. Click on TRANSPORT
  (E02) in the large selector to highlight it and specify it as the ship you
R want destroyed. To send the order to the FWS Explorer, click on the SEND ORD
O button. If you wait a few moments, you should receive a response from the 
W Explorer, complete with a visual of the Captain of the ship.
  
S Now you need to send the same order to the FWS Tau Ceti. The only thing you
K need to do is click on the + button at the left end of the SHIP selector, so
I that the Tau Ceti becomes the highlighted item there, and then click on 
D SEND ORD again. In a few seconds, the Captain of the Tau Ceti will also 
  respond.
R 
O While you're waiting to catch up with your target, you might as well take 
W some time to acquaint yourself with your opponents. Click on the Computer 
  Panel icon in the 300 bar (fourth from the left) to return to DATA 
S RETRIEVAL. When the panel pops up, click on the ENEMY button under DOCKET.
K The readout will now display an image of a member of the race/group you are
I opposing, and text describing them. Clicking on the up and down buttons to
D the left of the dossier text allows you to jump backwards and forwards 
  through the screens of information about the enemy (if any).
R 
O                              SKID ROW page 11
W 
  When you're finished researching your opponents, you might want to find 
S out about the Captains of the Explorer and Tau Ceti. Click on the FW 
K Captain button under DOCKET. The screen will now display information about
I the Captain of the ship currently highlighted in FLEET STAT mode, which 
D probably means the stats for your own character will appear. If this is the 
  case, click on the down button under the displayed Commander/Captain's name.
R After a moment you will see a picture of Captain Telifero Lawson, and his 
O dossier to the right. The dossier scrolls like the background information 
W on the enemy, with the up and down buttons. When you are done reading 
  Lawson's dossier, you can view that of the Captain of the Tau Ceti by 
S clicking again on the down button.
K 
I By now your ship should have closed in on the target vessel. Go back to
D NAVIGATION (sextant icon) and on the map you should see that your vessel 
  is now much closer to the enemy ship than when you started. In fact, the
R symbols representing your ship (F01) and the enemy (E01) may even be 
O overlapping. In any case, you'll probably want to zoom in for a tighter 
W view of the scene. Move the mouse pointer over the map area and, as you do,
  you'll notice that a set of brackets follow your movements. Using these 
S brackets frame an area which closely fits around your ship and the target,
K and then click the mouse. The area you framed will now jump up to fill the
I entire map. You can keep zooming in like this until you can clearly see the
D distance separating your ship from the target.
  
R        NOTE:  If you re-scale the map so much that the enemy ship
O        pops entirely out of view, you can back the zoom off by right-
W        clicking the mouse. Doing this will shrink the current map area
         to fit within the brackets. Left-clicking zooms in; right-clicking
S        zooms out.
K 
I By now you should be or almost be within range to combat the enemy vessel.
D Click on the Crosshair icon (3rd from the left) in the 300 bar to switch to
  the TACTICAL panel. Here is where you'll combat the enemy.
R 
O In a beginner level mission your ship's defensive energy shields are 
W automatically raised the moment another ship fires on you. However, since
  the enemy ships in this mission have no operational weapons systems, this
S will not happen. You can tell the status of the shields by looking at the
K defense subpanel to the lower right. If the SHIELDS button is highlighted
I and a green circle appears around the small picture of your ship there,
D then the shields are on. Clicking on the SHIELDS button toggles them on 
  and off. Just to get into the habit, raise the shields now.
R 
O                              SKID ROW page 12
W 
  Before going into combat you'll want to power up your Enhanced Beam
S Weapons (EBWs). At the top-center of the TACTICAL panel, directly under
K the WEAR label, is a power meter. A small arrowhead is at the left end 
I of the scale, and the power readout below it reads 000%, indicating that 
D the EBW power is off. Click on the arrowhead and, while holding the mouse
  button down, drag the arrowhead as far to the right of the scale as it 
R will go. When you release the mouse button the EBW power should be set 
O to 100%.
W 
  The enemy Scout in this mission has most of its systems severely crippled,
S but its shields are still partially intact. In order to capture the ship 
K you must board it, and in order to board it you need knock its shields and
I engines out entirely. To knock out the shields you'll want some very 
D precise weapons control. Click on the GET button just above the EBW power
  meter. The combat map will disappear, replaced by expanded weaponry 
R controls.  Note that the EBW FOCUS is currently set at NORM (normal). What
O you want to do is click on PIN, for pinpoint firing, allowing you to 
W target specific systems. Now move down to the PINPOINT EBW SET box. The
  default system to target is the communications system (COMM). Click on the
S SHLD button; you now have the shields targeted.
K 
I Click on the highlighted GET button to deselect it and restore the map
D display, then click on COMBAT ZONE to display a view with a radius of 
  500,000 kilometers. This is the maximum effective combat range of your
R ship's weapons, and the approximate range of your target.
O 
W At the center-left of the screen are a set of TARGET controls. Your target,
  Scout E01 appears in the selector bar. Click on ACQUIRE. The I.D. number of
S the target is fed into target slot A, and, as long as the A button is 
K highlighted, your computer will attempt to keep the weapons pointing in the
I direction of that target. As you can see, the targeting scope (the "viewer"
D towards the upper-left of the panel) immediately turns to find and lock 
  onto the target. When a lock is achieved a flashing ACQUISITION indicator
R appears at the bottom of the targeting scope along with an image of the 
O target starship.
W 
  Before you start firing, check the range to the target, listed as the 
S number to the  right of the R: at the top of the targeting scope. If the 
K number there is greater than 550,000 you are out of effective firing range.
I Wait until the range is approximately 550,000 kilometers, and the enemy 
D ship symbol appears in the map display, before firing.
  
R                              SKID ROW page 13
O 
W At this point, you'll want to attack. To fire the EBWs, click on the upper
  of the two FIRE buttons to the right of the targeting scope, making certain
S that the ACQUISITION indicator is present (if you fire while there is no 
K acquisition, you'll hit nothing). Each time you fire the EBW power level 
I drops, and you have to wait for the EBW power meter to build up before you
D can fire again, otherwise you'll be hitting the target with very little 
  energy. (The second FIRE button is for firing missiles. However since your
R ship is carrying no missiles in this mission, clicking on it will have no
O result.)
W 
  Directly to the left of the tactical icon are a set of six readouts, which
S represent your computer's estimation of the damage the enemy ship's systems
K have sustained (do not confuse these with the similar damage readouts for
I your own ship, which appear in the 300 bar). Each time you fire, glance at
D the tiny red bar to the right of the S (shields) meter there. When the bar
  alongside the S readout vanishes completely, then the enemy ship's shields
R have been completely disabled (this could require as few as 3 or as many 
O as 9 full-power EBW hits to accomplish).
W 
  When the enemy's shields have been destroyed, click on GET and then move
S the highlighter on PINPOINT EBW SET to DRIVE. Click on GET again to restore
K the map, then continue firing on the enemy ship until red bar next to the D
I vanishes completely, indicating that the enemy drive systems are completely
D destroyed (this should require between 5 and 10 full-power EBW hits).
  
R You are now ready to board the enemy vessel. The ATTITUDE controls in the
O lower left-hand corner of the screen now come into play. These controls are
W normally used to set your range to the target, your position relative to it,
  and which shield you want to keep towards it. In boarding situations you use
S it to bring your starship within boarding range, which is from 0 to 5000 
K kilometers. Using the mouse, drag the yellow arrowhead next to the RANGE 
I meter all the way to the bottom of the scale, and then click on the POSIT 
D button just to the right of the ATTITUDE control box. Your ship will now 
  take up a position alongside the enemy vessel. Wait until the R: readout 
R in the targeting scope is under 5000 and then click on the BOARD to 
O initiate the boarding sequence.
W 
  As soon as the SQUAD DEPLOYMENT (401) panel appears, you'll want to
S pause the game. Click on the pause button (11) towards the right end of the
K 300 bar. When the button is lit up, all action on the screen should freeze,
I including the numbers under the BOARDING CHRONO readout, but the screen 
D should remain intact (if the screen clears to black, you did not set the 
  game for beginner level). Clicking on this button again unpauses - but 
R you'll want to read the following section before allowing the game to 
O continue.
W 
                               SKID ROW page 14
S 
K Boarding an Enemy Vessel
I 
D Your Fleet Commander character now becomes a Squad Leader and leads a
  group of marines (members of the Federated Worlds Special Forces--or
R FWSF) in boarding the enemy vessel. The squad is transported to the enemy
O vessel and must attempt to wrest control of a specified percentage of 
W systems away from the opposing crew.
  
S        NOTE:  If you have Breach 2 and use the IGS system, it is in
K        boarding situations where Breach 2 will be loaded. In some
I        missions, such as this one, no Breach 2 scenarios have been
D        linked to a ship or outpost, so in this particular mission Breach
         2 will not be loaded.
R 
O The SQUAD DEPLOYMENT panel shows an image of a FWSF marine in full
W combat gear to the left, and an image of the opposing force type to the 
  right. The name of your commander, and his/her squad-level statistics 
S appear, as does the name of the enemy race/force and the rank of their
K Captain. At the center of the display is a SYSTEMS CONTROL meter, which 
I shows how much of the enemy ship's systems you control and how much is
D controlled by the enemy. A horizontal marker indicates the level of control
  you must reach in order to be victorious. When the meter for FWSF reaches
R that marker, you have won control of the alien ship. As your meter 
O increases the meter for your opponents decreases, and vice-versa.
W 
  You have no actual control over the boarding sequence, other than choosing
S to abort it by clicking on the WITHDRAW/UNDOCK button. As this mission is
K very easy you'll have little trouble wresting control of the enemy ship 
I from your opponents. In fact, the BOARDING CHRONO will probably never even
D reach 5 minutes before you are victorious.
  
R To see all this happen unpause the game and let the fighting continue.
O 
W When you have seized control of the ship a usurper box appears telling you
  that "The boarding action was successful." Click on OK on this box to 
S return to your own flagship.
K 
I                              SKID ROW page 15
D 
  Completing the Mission
R 
O In the time it took you to complete this task, the other ships under your
W command should have intercepted and attacked Enemy Transport E02. Chances
  are they've sent reports to you while you were busy fighting the Scout. 
S Look at the Communications icon in the 300 bar. To the right of the antenna
K symbol is a two digit number, which lists the number of messages "waiting"
I for you. There should be at least two, maybe as many as six, waiting. Click
D on the icon to go to COMMUNICATIONS. The last message received is the one 
  displayed at the top of the list and sender's picture is the one shown. 
R Pressing the down button allows you to scroll back through the messages. 
O Chances are by now that the other ships have destroyed their target.
W 
  With two of your three mission objectives met, all that's left for you to 
S do is get your ships to Waypoint 1, as specified in your mission briefing.
K To see which mission objectives have been met, click on the Computer Panel
I icon (fourth from left) to return to DATA RETRIEVAL and click on the 
D OBJECTIVES button. All mission objectives will be displayed, with a check
  mark preceding all of those that have been met.
R 
O Switch back to COMMUNICATIONS. On the ORDER selector, click on right until
W the order "Proceed to Waypoint" appears as the highlighted item in the 
  list. Note that the large selector to the right now lists all waypoints (in
S this case, one: XO1). Since you want to send the order to both the Explorer
K and Tau Ceti, just click on the ALL button to give the order to both ships
I rather than sending them individual orders. If you wait a few moments you
D should receive acknowledgments from both ships.
  
R Finally, switch back to the NAVIGATION panel (sextant icon) and click on
O the WAY button at the bottom of the AUTOPILOT box. A list of waypoints 
W appears, again with only one item listed/highlighted. Click on the INTRCPT
  button to make for it. Your ship will now proceed at full power towards 
S Waypoint 1. It will take a few minutes of game-time (under 3) to reach the
K Waypoint. Since game time is equal to real time, this may take longer than
I you want. To make time pass more quickly, click with the right-most mouse
D button on the >> time-accelerator button above the CHRONO readout in the 
  300 bar. Right-clicking on this button causes the acceleration to jump from
R 1 x REALTIME (no acceleration) to 32 x REALTIME, which means 32 seconds of
O game time will pass for each second of real-time which passes. If you watch
W the CHRONO readout you'll notice that just over a minute of game-time 
  passes every two seconds. In a matter of moments, your ship and its 
S companions will reach the Waypoint and the mission will end. A box will
K appear notifying you, "Your mission has been completed."
I 
D                              SKID ROW page 16
    (we got lazy after this point...there are no more page #'s given!)
R
O When you click on this box's OK button, the screen clears and a computer
W evaluation of your performance is displayed. Pressing any key returns
  you to the navigation screen.
S 
K At this point, the mission clock is frozen, and all activity is ceased. It
I is at this point you could switch from panel to panel, examining the final
D mission status before leaving the mission. When you are finished, click on
  the disk icon button in the 300 bar. This will exit the mission and save
R your Fleet Commander's stats.
O 
W Congratulations! You have just completed your first mission as commander of
  a Federated Worlds force!
S 
K Keyboard Tutorial
I 
D Start Rules of Engagement according to the instructions for your computer
  (see Getting Started section).
R 
O When the credit roll has ended (or you have bypassed it by pressing a key
W during the "chronology"), you will arrive in the game itself and be faced
  with a computer interface panel labeled "GAME/MISSION 101", over which is a
S green bar labeled "MAIN MENU 100". An animated Federated Worlds Armed
K Forces logo appears at screen center. Along the top and left side of the
I screen are a series of control buttons, all colored magenta/purple. The
D first thing you need to learn about magenta or blue (blue=cyan in IBM CGA).
  "Highlighted" buttons are the active controlling Rules of Engagement is
R that the only "buttons" you can use are Items. A highlighted magenta button
O turns white, and a blue button/item turns cyan (in CGA the cyan items
W highlight to white).
  
S        NOTE:  In this keyboard tutorial all on-screen buttons are listed
K        in italicized, capital letters, as in: FIRE. Keyboard keys are
I        listed in boldface, as in: "Press X to..." Panel labels are listed
D        in capitalized non-bold text.
  
R        NOTE ON THE NUMERIC KEYPAD: The Num-Lock function
O        on PC keyboards is disabled by Rules of Engagement so that
W        users with smaller keyboards can use the cursor functions on
         the keypad. When a number key in indicated by the instructions,
S        press the key on the main keyboard, not the numeric pad.
K 
I Each and every game button has a keyboard equivalent. But with only a few
D exceptions (see page 47), the keyboard equivalents are listed right on the
  screen.  Look at the INFO button at the top of the screen. There is a small
R line, or overscore, above the letter 'I' on the button. This overscore
O indicates what key to press on your computer keyboard to activate the
W on-screen button. Look at the other magenta buttons on the screen and
  you'll see similar overscored letters (or function key numbers). When you
S press the equivalent key for a button the button will either highlight or
K flash (depending on its function). Ignore the buttons across the top of the
I screen and under the BUILDER bracket. In this tutorial we are concerned
D only with the buttons under the GAME and NEW GAME brackets.
  
R As you portray the Fleet Commander in the game, your first step must be to
O create your alter-ego. Press F to activate the button labeled FLEET CMDR
W under NEW GAME to create a new Fleet Commander. The animated logo is
  replaced by a large item selector listing all existing Fleet Commanders
S (this box is probably empty). At the bottom-right side of the selector are
K four purple buttons, one of which is labeled CREATE. Press C to activate
I it. A small yellow and green (white and cyan in CGA) "usurper" box will
D appear, asking "Are you sure you want to create a new Fleet Commander?"
  "Press Y to continue." Following a brief "Please stand by..." message, a
R larger box appears, this one featuring a picture of a Fleet Commander and a
O field for his/her name. Press N and a text editing frame with a thin cursor
W appears in the FLEET CMDR NAME fold. Type in the name of your choice (up to
  18 characters you can use the Backspace key to edit) and then press
S Enter/Return on your keyboard. Your character is now named.  Before
K actually creating the character, you will probably want to decide what
I he/she looks like. Pressing the X button cycles through the various options
D for your character's appearance. Men and women of several ethnicities are
  available.
R 
O When you've selected an appearance, press C. The CREATE COMMANDER
W box disappears and you will now see your new character listed in the item
  selector, with the word "available" appearing to the right of his/her name.
S 
K Now it's time to create a game. Press T to activate the CREATE button under
I the NEW GAME bracket at screen left. The contents of the selector will
D change to list available missions and Fleet Commanders. You must select a
  mission and a character in order to start a new game. Use UP and DOWN keys
R to move the highlighter for MISSION to A SHAKEDOWN CRUISE, and use the LEFT
O and RIGHT keys to move the highlighter for FLEET CMDR to the name of your
W Fleet Commander. Press G to make a new game.
  
S A usurper box will appear. Press N to activate EDIT NAME and a text editing
K frame and cursor will appear in the GAME NAME field. Using the keyboard,
I type the name "Tutorial", then press Enter/Return. Finally, you will want
D to select a mission difficulty. Make sure that the blue BEGINNER button is
  highlighted. If it is not, press B. (You must be on beginner level to
R follow this tutorial as written!) Now press D for DONE. You are returned to
O the main screen.
W 
  Press X to activate the EXISTING button under the GAMES bracket. The
S selector will now list all existing game files.  Make certain that the game
K TUTORIAL is highlighted (press $ to get the highlighter on its name if
I not), and then press P to PLAY the game. A "Please stand by..." message
D will appear. After a few moments, the screen will go black and then return
  with an image of space. The mission title and author's name appear over a
R picture of a Federated World's Dreadnought. A moment later, the game screen
O will appear.
W 
  Across the top of the screen is a bar with a number 300 at the far left.
S This "300 bar" is the main menu of your ship's computer interface and is
K present at all times during the game. It contains the buttons for switching
I between various panels, controls for setting the game's time-passage speed,
D damage readouts and the elapsed mission time clock (CHRONO).
  
R Below the 300 bar is the DATA RETRIEVAL panel (numbered 304). This is your
O ship's computer, where you can check on the condition of your fleet, and
W get background information on your mission, status, and data about the
  Captains on the ships under your command and the enemy you face.
S 
K      NOTE:  You may notice that there are no keyboard equivalents listed
I             on these icons. Each button on the 300 bar is assigned a
D             function key, and they are numbered sequentially, left to
              right. The first icon is F1, the second F2, and so on.
R 
O The current data display before you is the FLEET STAT readout. It lists all
W of the ships under your command and their last reported status. The first
  ship listed, identified as F01, is your own flagship (the FWS Yury
S Gagarin), a Destroyer. The other ships are: F02, a Scout (the FWS
K Explorer), and F03, a Destroyer (the FWS Tau Ceti).
I 
D Along the right side of the screen are buttons which will change the data
  played on this panel.  Press B to access the BRIEFING button under MISSION.
R A written briefing appears, describing exactly what you must do to
O successfully complete your mission.
W 
  When you've finished reading the briefing, press F1 to activate the first
S icon (a sextant) in the 300 bar at the top of the screen. This will move
K from the DATA Retrieval panel to the NAVIGATION controls. Your mission
I requires you to capture enemy vessel E01 (a scout) and destroy enemy ship
D E02 (a transport). Both the enemy ships and your own ships appear in the
  map which dominates most of the panel. Each ship is indicated by a small
R arrow and an associated number. When you first view the map, you will see
O only the ship symbols. At the top of the map area are a series of buttons,
W only two of which, FWS and ENS, will be highlighted. If you press the
  associated letter for the others (S=STR/stars, D=AFD/asteroid fields,
S Y=WAY/waypoints, O=OUT/outposts, and L=PLN/planets), the map will then
K display those items as well (if any). The only items you are concerned with
I in this mission are ships and waypoints. All ships are already selected for
D display, so press Y to view the system's one waypoint.
  
R When you first see the map you are in mix mode, which shows the entire
O system. To center on your own ship, press K to LOCK-ON with the TELEMETRY
W controls. The map will change and center on your ship, showing an area
  47 million kilometers in radius.
S 
K In order to capture the enemy Scout ship, you must first intercept it. At
I screen left is a selector which allows you to probe, chase or intercept
D anything in the solar system. The highlighted (white bar) item in the list
  below the buttons for these functions indicates the current item. Below
R this selector are buttons for selecting what type of item you are
O interested in probing, chasing, etc. The default is ENS, for "Enemy Ships",
W and your target vessel should be highlighted, as it is the first of the two
  enemy ships in the sector. Press B to activate the PROBE button, and the
S list of enemy ships is replaced by a scanner readout of the enemy ship in
K question. You now have your prey identified, and it's time to move in.
I 
D Press C to initiate a CHASE. The I.D. number of the enemy ship (E01) will
  appear in the small readout to the right of the INTRCPT button, and the
R small sextant icon alongside the HELM controls (lower-left corner of the
O screen) will flash, indicating that your ship is in autopilot mode. Your
W ship is now moving in on the target at full speed, and will automatically
  match course and speed when it has caught up with it.
S 
K It will take approximately 2 to 3 minutes of real-time to intercept the
I target. In the meantime, you'll want to send your other ships after the
D enemy Transport.  Press F2 to activate the dish-antenna icon on the 300
  bar. This will switch to the COMMUNICATIONS panel (302). On this panel, you
R need to specify the order to send and the ship to receive it. At the
O left-center of the screen is a selector labeled ORDER. Press the $key
W repeatedly until the order "DESTROY ENEMY SHIP" appears as the highlighted
  (white bar) item in the list. Now press K to highlight the ACKNOWLEDGE
S button. This will tell the Captain(s) to whom you are sending the order to
K send an acknowledgment when the order has been obeyed.
I 
D Note that the FWS Explorer (F02) is the highlighted item in the Ship
  selector just below the ORDER box. You will notice that both of these
R selectors are now linked to the larger selector to the right, which now
O lists every ENEMY SHIP, and that a bar now connects this selector to a send
W order box in the lower left-hand corner of the screen. Use the Home and End
  keys to move the highlighter up and down until it rests on TRANSPORT (E02)
S in the large selector, specifying it as the ship you want destroyed. To
K send the order to the FWS Explorer, press S to activate the SEND ORD
I button. If you wait a few moments, you should receive a response from the
D Explorer, complete with a visual of the Captain of the ship.
  
R Now you need to send the same order to the FWS Tau Ceti. The only thing you
O need to do is press the + key so that the Tau Ceti becomes the highlighted
W item in the SHIP selector, and then press S again to send the order. In a
  few seconds, the Captain of the Tau Ceti will also respond.
S 
K While you're waiting to catch up with your target, you might as well take
I some time to acquaint yourself with your opponents. Press F4 to activate
D the Computer Panel icon in the 300 bar (fourth from the left) and return to
  DATA RETRIEVAL. When the panel pops up, press E to access ENEMY data under
R DOCKET. The readout will now display an image of a member of the race/group
O you are opposing, and text describing them.  Pressing the PageUp and
W PageDown keys allows you to jump backwards and forwards through the
  screens of information about the enemy (if any).
S 
K When you're finished researching your opponents, you might want to find out
I about the Captains of the Explorer and Tau Ceti. Press C to access the FW
D Captain data under DOCKET. The screen will now display information about
  the Captain of the ship currently highlighted in FLEET STAT mode, which
R probably means the stats for your own character will appear. If this is the
O case, just press the DOWN key. After a moment you will see a picture of
W Captain Telifero Lawson, and his dossier to the right. The dossier scrolls
  just like the background information on the enemy, using the PageUp and
S PageDown keys. When you are done reading Lawson's dossier, you can view
K that of the Captain of the Tau Ceti by pressing DOWN again.
I 
D By now your ship should have closed in on the target vessel. Go back to
  NAVIGATION (press F1 for the sextant icon) and on the map you should see
R that your vessel is now much closer to the enemy ship than when you
O started. In fact, the symbols representing your ship (F01) and the enemy
W (E01) may even be overlapping.
  
S By now you should be or almost be within range to combat the enemy vessel.
K Press F3 to activate the Crosshair icon in the 300 bar, thus switching to
I the TACTICAL panel. Here is where you'll combat the enemy.
D 
  In a beginner level mission your ship's defensive energy shields are
R automatically raised the moment another ship fires on you. However, since
O the enemy ships in this mission have no operational weapons systems, this
W will not happen. You can tell the status of the shields by looking at the
  defense subpanel to the lower right. If the SHIELDS button is highlighted
S and a green circle appears around the small picture of your ship there,
K then the shields are on. Pressing S toggles the shields on and off. Just to
I get into the habit, raise the shields now.
D 
  Before going into combat you'll want to power up your Enhanced Beam
R Weapons (EBWs). At the top-center of the TACTICAL panel, directly under the
O WEAR label, is a power meter. A small arrowhead is at the left end of the
W scale, and the power readout below it reads 000%, indicating that the EBW
  power is off.  Press the End key on your keyboard, and you'll notice that
S the RIGHT button below the meter will become highlighted and the arrowhead
K will move towards the right end of the scale. When the EBW power reading is
I at 100%, press the End key again.
D 
  The enemy Scout in this mission has most of its systems severely crippled,
R but its shields are still partially intact. In order to capture the ship
O you must board it, and in order to board it you need to knock its shields
W and engines out entirely. To knock out the shields you'll want some very
  precise weapons control. Press G to toggle on the GET button above the EBW
S power meter. The combat map will disappear, replaced by expanded weaponry
K controls. Note that the EBW FOCUS is currently set at NORM (normal). What
I you want to do is press N, for PIN, or 'pinpoint' firing. This allows you
D to target specific systems. Now look at the PINPOINT EBW SET box. The
  default system to target is the communications system (COMM). Press the
R plus (+) four times until the blue SHLD label is highlighted; you now have
O the shields targeted.
W 
  Press G again to deactivate GET mode and restore the map display, then
S press Z to switch the map to COMBAT ZONE, which displays a view with a
K radius of 500,000 kilometers. This is the maximum effective combat range of
I your ship's weapons, and the approximate range of your target.
D 
  At the center-left of the screen are a set of TARGET controls. Your target,
R Scout E01 appears in the selector bar. Press Q to ACQUIRE the ship. The
O I.D. number of the target is fed into target slot A, and, as long as the A
W button is highlighted, your computer will attempt to keep the weapons
  pointing in the direction of that target. As you can see, the targeting
S scope (the "viewer" towards the upper-left of the panel) immediately turns
K to find and lock onto the target. When a lock is achieved a flashing
I ACQUISITION indicator appears at the bottom of the targeting scope along
D with an image of the target starship.
  
R Before you start firing, check the range to the target, listed as the
O number to the right of the R: at the top of the targeting scope. If the
W number there is greater than 550,000 you are out of effective firing range.
  Wait until the range is approximately 550,000 kilometers, and the enemy
S ship symbol appears in the map display, before firing.
K 
I At this point, you'll want to attack. To fire the EBWs, press the F9 key,
D which triggers the upper of the two FIRE buttons to the right of the
  targeting scope making certain that the ACQUISITION indicator is present
R (if you fire while there is no acquisition, you'll hit nothing). Each time
O you fire the EBW power level drops, and you have to wait for the EBW power
W meter to build up before you can fire again, otherwise you'll be hitting
  the target with very little energy.
S 
K (The second FIRE button, F10, is for firing missiles. However since your
I ship is carrying no missiles in this mission, pressing it will have no
D result.)
  
R Directly to the left of the tactical icon are a set of six readouts, which
O represent your computer's estimation of the damage the enemy ship's systems
W have sustained (do not confuse these with the similar damage readouts for
  your own ship, which appear in the 300 bar). Each time you fire, glance at
S the tiny red bar to the right of the S (shields) meter there. When the bar
K alongside the S readout vanishes completely, then the enemy ship's shields
I have been completely disabled (this could require as few as 3 or as many as
D 9 full-power EBW hits to accomplish).
  
R When the enemy's shields have been destroyed, press G to GET the extended
O weapons controls. Use the plus key to move the highlighter on PINPOINT EBW
W SET to DRIVE. Press G again to restore the map, then continue firing on the
  enemy ship until the red bar next to the D vanishes completely, indicating
S that the enemy drive systems are completely destroyed (this should require
K between 5 and 10 full-power EBW hits).
I 
D You are now ready to board the enemy vessel. The ATTITUDE controls in the
  lower left-hand corner of the screen now come into play. These controls are
R normally used to set your range to the target, your position relative to
O it, and which shield you want to keep towards it. In boarding situations
W you use it to bring your starship within boarding range, which is from 0 to
  5000 kilometers. Press the 0 (zero) key, which will make the yellow
S arrowhead next the RANGE move down. When it has reached the bottom of the
K scale, press 0 again. Now press I to activate Posit button just to the
I right of the ATTITUDE control box. Your ship will now take up a position
D alongside the enemy vessel. Wait until the R: readout in the targeting
  scope is under 5000 and then press R (for BOARD) to initiate the boarding
R sequence. As soon as the SQUAD DEPLOYMENT (401) panel appears, you'll want
O to pause the game. Pressing F7 activates the pause button (11) towards the
W right end of the 300 bar. When the button is lit up, all action on the
  screen should freeze, including the numbers under the BOARDING CHRONO
S readout, but the screen should remain intact (if the screen clears to
K black, you did not set the game for beginner level). Pressing F7 again
I unpauses but you'll want to read the following section before allowing the
D game to continue.
  
R Boarding an Enemy Vessel
O 
W Your Fleet Commander character now becomes a Squad Leader and leads a
  group of marines in boarding the enemy vessel. The squad is transported to
S the enemy vessel and must attempt to wrest control of a specified
K percentage of systems away from the opposing crew.
I 
D      NOTE:  If you have Breach 2 and use the IGS system, it is in
              boarding situations where Breach 2 will be loaded. In some
R             missions, such as this one, no Breach 2 scenarios have been
O             linked to a ship or outpost, so in this particular mission
W             Breach 2 will not be loaded.
  
S The SQUAD DEPLOYMENT panel shows an image of a FWSF marine in full combat
K gear to the left, and an image of the opposing force type to the right. The
I name of your commander, and his/her squad-level statistics appear, as does
D the name of the enemy race/force and the rank of their Captain. At the
  center of the display is a SYSTEMS CONTROL meter, which shows how much of
R the enemy ship's systems you control and how much is controlled by the
O enemy. A horizontal marker indicates the level of control you must reach in
W order to be victorious. When the meter for FWSF reaches that marker, you
  have won control of the alien ship. As your meter increases the meter for
S your opponents decreases, and vice-versa.
K 
I You have no actual control over the boarding sequence, other than choosing
D to abort it by pressing W to activate the WITHDRAW/UNDOCK button. As this
  mission is very easy you'll have little trouble wresting control of the
R enemy ship from your opponents. In fact, the BOARDING CHRONO will probably
O never even reach 5 minutes before you are victorious.
W 
  To see all this happen unpause the game and let the fighting continue.
S 
K When you have seized control of the ship a usurper box appears telling you
I that "The boarding action was successful." Press O for OK on this box to
D return to your own flagship.
  
R Completing the Mission
O 
W In the time it took you to complete this task, the other ships under your
  command should have intercepted and attacked Enemy Transport E02. Chances
S are they've sent reports while you were busy fighting the Scout.  Look at
K the Communications icon in the 300 bar. To the right of the antenna symbol
I is a two-digit number, which lists the number of messages "waiting" for
D you. There should be at least two, maybe as many as six, waiting. Press F2
  to go to COMMUNICATIONS. The last message received is the one displayed at
R the top of the list and sender's picture is the one shown. Pressing the
O LEFT key allows you to scroll back through the messages. It's quite likely
W that the other ships have destroyed their target by now.
  
S With two of your three mission objectives met, all that's left for you to
K do is get your ships to Waypoint 1, as specified in your mission briefing.
I To see which mission objectives have been met, press F4 to return to DATA
D RETRIEVAL and then press O to activate the OBJECTIVES button. All mission
  objectives will be displayed, with a checkmark preceding all of those that
R have been met.
O 
W Use F2 to switch back to COMMUNICATIONS. Press RIGHT until the order
  "Proceed to Waypoint" appears as the highlighted item in the ORDERS list.
S Note that the large selector to the right now lists all waypoints (in this
K case, one: X01). Since you want to send the order to both the Explorer and
I Tau Ceti, just press L (for ALL) to give the order to both ships rather
D than sending them individual orders. If you wait a few moments you should
  receive acknowledgments from both ships.
R 
O Finally, use F1 to switch back to the NAVIGATION panel, and press W to
W highlight the WAY button at the bottom of the Autopilot box. A list of
  waypoints appears, again with only one item listed/highlighted. Press I to
S INTRCPT (intercept) it. Your ship will now proceed at full power towards
K Waypoint 1. It will take a few minutes of game-time (under 3) to reach the
I Waypoint. Since game-time is equal to real time, this may take longer than
D you want. To make time pass more quickly, hold down a Shift key while
  pressing the F5 key, calling the time-accelerator button >> above the
R CHRONO readout in the 300 bar. Pressing Shift-F8 causes the acceleration to
O jump from 1 x REALTIME (no acceleration) to 32 x REALTIME, which means 32
W seconds of game time will pass for each second of real-time which passes.
  If you watch the CHRONO readout you'll notice that just over a minute of
S game-time passes every two seconds. In a matter of moments, your ship and
K its companions will reach the Waypoint and the mission will end. A box will
I appear notifying you, "Your mission has been completed." Press O to OK
D this. The screen clears and a computer evaluation of your performance is
  displayed. Pressing any key returns you to the navigation screen.
R 
O At this point, the mission clock is frozen, and all activity is ceased. It
W is at this point you could switch from panel to panel, examining the final
  mission status before leaving the mission. When you are finished, press F5
S to activate the disk icon button in the 300 bar. This will exit the mission
K and save your Fleet Commander's stats.
I 
D Congratulations! You have just completed your first mission as commander of
  a Federated Worlds force!
R 
O                          PART II: THE STORY SO FAR
W 
  Historical Briefing
S 
K The First Stellar Expansion began on May 10th, 2029, with the first
I practical demonstration of the hyperdrive field effect. The test was
D carried out in Building Number 4 of Area 117 of the Franklin Laboratories
  test range (a converted Army Ammunition Plant) at Hawthorne, Nevada, in
R what was then the United States of America. Five years later, that
O country's National Aeronautics and Space Administration deployed the
W unmanned vehicles Odysseus I & II to test the practicality of hyperdrive as
  a method of interplanetary and interstellar travel. Odysseus I successfully
S engaged hyperdrive, but its field effect was greater than anticipated, and
K resulted in the destruction of both the probe and the Space Tug which had
I launched it. Odysseus II was launched two months later, and its hyperdrive
D activated only when it had left the vicinity of Earth and Luna. Odysseus II
  returned to Earth orbit three weeks later, having successfully
R "hyperjumped" to the Oort Cloud at the perimeter of the Sol system, taken
O readings and photos, and then returned.
W 
  In 2040, only 11 years after the hyperdrive field was first tested and
S seven years after the Odysseus probes, the first practical starship, the
K USSC Gerardus Mercator, with its crew of seven, made a successful jump of
I over two lightyears through hyperspace. Less than 100 years after that
D first manned jump, the colonies of Earth consisted of 8 planets and over 18
  billion inhabitants, scattered across several solar systems in the
R "neighborhood" of Sol/Earth, and were known as the Home Cluster.
O 
W Hyperspace proved to be rather curious. It was totally devoid of energy or
  matter, yet spacecraft could operate normally within its bounds. A trip
S through it (a hyperjump) would take, regardless of the actual distance in
K "normal" space, 6.8433 Earth days. There were, however, two limitations to
I its use. One was the enormous amount of energy required to enter
D hyperspace. The other was the so-called "Mass Limit", which, stated simply,
  placed a severe limit on the size of spacecraft that could enter
R hyperspace.
O 
W By the early 2100's the starships, powered by mass-conversion, were
  strained severely just to travel from one end of the Home Cluster to the
S opposite end, and three ships were lost when the strain overloaded their
K systems. The energy/fuel requirements for jumps beyond the Home Cluster
I demanded starships larger than the Mass Limit permitted. Because of this
D fact, and that all of the Home Cluster colonies remained dependant on Earth
  for support, the experts were predicting an end to the Expansion. As usual,
R the experts were wrong.
O 
W In 2105, a team of scientists, traveling through the far reaches of the Tau
  Ceti solar system, were shocked when they discovered a huge alien artifact
S drifting Through space. Entire scientific communities came to study the
K artifact and, several years later, the purpose of the great object was
I discovered. It was a hyperspace booster, a device with the capability to
D "push" spacecraft (and other objects) not tens but thousands of lightyears
  through hyperspace. Since the booster itself did not enter hyperspace (it
R was calculated to exceed the Mass limit by a factor of over 7,453), a ship
O right up to the Mass Limit could travel enormous distances using virtually
W no power.
  
S Years of research continued. Why had the Charon, the "gatekeepers" as the
K scientists dubbed them, abandoned a working booster? Where had they gone?
I The scientists were unable to say. The booster contained a mapping system
D depicting millions of the galaxy's stars, but few of them had been
  specifically marked by the Charon.
R 
O Eventually, elements of the Charon's control system were deciphered and
W trial boosts began. They proved the booster to be fully functional and the
  technicians' knowledge of the control system was deemed adequate to allow
S regular use. The Second Expansion was underway.
K 
I Your home is in a cluster of stars known as the Local Group. For years the
D Local Group had been receiving Development Assistance packages from the
  Home Cluster, to assist them in constructing new colonies and providing
R updates to their technology. Fifty years ago, the shipments stopped coming.
O Officially, the word was there hadn't been any indication that they would
W stop. The next ten years were known as The Great Panic, a period of
  interstellar war and piracy that nearly destroyed human civilization in the
S Local Group. Fortunately, at the peak of hostilities, a hyperspace booster
K was discovered inside the Local Group. The knowledge that two-way
I communication with the Home Cluster might be established acted to calm the
D Local Group. A monumental plan was put into action to move the booster,
  entirely at sublight speeds, into orbit around Cetus Amicus. But, during
R the twenty-plus years the move required, the Local Group gain fell into
O turmoil, this time to emerge divided into two mutually hostile governments:
W the Federated Worlds (FW) and the United Democratic Planets (UDP).
  
S Following years of instability and chaos, the FW and UDP ceased hostilities
K and formed an overreaching governmental agency known as the Local Group
I Unification Organization, which was to oversee the slow re-unification of
D the two nations.
  
R Several years after the re-unification process began, the hyperspace
O booster at Cetus Amicus was certified as operational. The Federated Worlds,
W eager to reestablish contact with the Home Cluster, dispatched the FWS
  Union, under the command of Captain Alex G. Seward, to use the booster and
S travel to Tau Ceti III the location of the Home Cluster's hyperspace
K booster. Captain Seward completed his mission, overcoming a saboteur and
I xenophobic locals, and uncovered the truth about the discontinuance of
D Development Assistance packages to the Local Group. Seward's report of his
  findings, sent back to the Local Group via the Tau Ceti booster, led to an
R investigation by the Federated Worlds Special Forces' Intelligence Division
O (FWSF- ID). It was discovered that a conspiracy had been going on for those
W fifty years of non-contact, involving high-level officials in not only the
  Home Cluster, but also in both the FW and UDP, many of whom were currently
S serving on the Local Group Unification Organization's high council (NOTE:
K specific details are CLASSIFIED at this time). Some of the investigation's
I findings were leaked, and this caused the Unification Organization to
D collapse. With both UDP and FW governments implicated in the conspiracy,
  both sides grew mistrustful and hostile. Following several military
R incidents, the UDP declared war on the Federated Worlds.
O 
W This is the situation which exists today.
  
S 
K Coded Situation Orders
I 
D NAVCOM ENCODED TRANSMISSION CODED LEVEL: ARCHER ABLE ONE
  
R TO:  FWAF Task Force Commander   Code Number Te56 Ra8790u
O 
W FM:  Admiral V. Bresheliah, Marine Operations, H9 Axia
  
S RE:  OPERATION BLINDING LIGHT
K 
I MG:  You have been selected to command the FWAF Third Fleet. In this
D capacity your responsibility will be to lead missions as part of Operation
  Blinding Light ("Operation Blinder" to the FWSF Marine squads your fleet
R may deploy), a large-scale Fleet operation composed of a series of missions
O in numerous solar systems.  In each mission you will take command of the
W flagship of a selected task force and lead the vessels of that force in
  accomplishing the goals of the mission.
S 
K 'Your missions will be varied, ranging from escorting supply transports to
I seek-and-destroy strikes in hostile systems. Although many missions may be
D straightforward ship to ship combat in deep space, in others your task
  force may be required to capture enemy ships and/or outposts.  In such
R circumstances, you will deploy squads of FWSF Marines for boarding, rescue
O and control operations against the selected targets.
W 
  It is important for you to remember that often you will be commanding not
S just one ship, but entire groups of ships. Each of those ships has a
K captain who, just like you, has his own responsibilities, strengths and
I weaknesses. You must try to gain an understanding of those captains and
D their abilities in order to make the most effective use of them.
  
R Good luck,
O Adm. Vikotor Bresheliah, FLFETOPS, FtA.
W 
  END TRANSMISSION
S 
K 
I Intelligence Reports
D 
  The UDP
R 
O In 2348 the United Democratic Planets (UDP) was formed, chiefly to avoid
W coming under the regulations of the Federated Worlds (established three
  years earlier), which the UDP founders felt provided for far too much
S individual liberty. UDP allied governments, as a whole, exert a great deal
K more influence on the day-to-day lives of the citizenry than Federated
I Worlds governments. The UDP has developed into a steadily increasing
D threat to the stability of the Local Group and declared war on the
  Federated Worlds (FW) in early 2374. In that time the UDP has undertaken
R both overt and covert operations aimed at the destruction of the FW.
O                                                   
W The UDP military has no special name or designation. They are simply UDP
  Forces. In terms of technology, the UDP tends to be roughly on-par with the
S FW, although some of their equipment is slightly less sophisticated.
K 
I Their soldiers are, on the whole, excellent, although in recent years a few
D "cracks" have appeared in the loyalty of the rank and file. Beware of
  letting this type of information lessen your opinion of them, as an
R experienced UDP starship commander is not to be taken lightly. They are
O formidable.
W 
  Member and allied worlds of the UDP consist of: Arbest, Aureilse, Bahnir,
S Baliolsol, Benison, Fevvel, Grotto, Miga Kambut, Milokarr, Myl, Rouvchorra,
K Schrelos, Sirrial, and Stowe. The UDP has outposts in many systems, and
I several important allies, including the "Aliens" and several species of
D "Mute".
  
R Aliens
O 
W A generic term for creatures of unknown origin. The "Aliens" we refer to
  today are strange beings, apparently sapient, which have developed as an
S increasing threat to the Federated Worlds in recent years. They are tall,
K bipedal creatures with no arms and squat bodies. Their single-eyed and
I beaked head is held high above the body by a powerful snakelike neck. Their
D exact origin in unknown, but their ability to withstand, unprotected,
  environments ranging from hellish to vacuum, has led many scientists to
R speculate that they originated either from a planet humans would categorize
O as uninhabitable or were genetic engineering experiments. Little is known
W about the Aliens except that they communicate using electromagnetic energy
  and infrared light, that they almost all seem to possess the ability to
S attack with a psionic stun, and that their nervous systems have the
K peculiar capability of building up an odd energetic charge which can then
I be released through the creatures' "eye", resulting in a deadly beam.
D 
  Interestingly, although the Aliens are hostile to FW forces, they seem to
R have struck up some kind of relationship with the UDP and some other
O factions and races hostile to the FW, including the recently discovered and
W highly dangerous Cybers, whose ships they have been detected on. Aliens are
  sometimes found controlling ships of their own, attacking any FW forces
S they encounter. All FW attempts at communication with the Aliens have been
K failures.
I 
D Muties
  
R "Mutie" is a common Local Group colloquialism for "mutant", and is most
O commonly used in reference to proto-sapient beings originating on Tuoles
W Laicr'mok - a planet in the LG-MD8 system, at the very perimeter of the
  Local Group.  There are numerous varieties of muties, although the most
S common are the "Beta Muties" (Mutai Laicr'mok Beta), disgusting, leg less
K beings that move around on motorized treads.
I 
D Several varieties of muties have been trained by the UDP to act as
  everything from servants to combat forces. They range in threat potential
R from the pathetic to the formidable, so caution is advised.         
O                                                       
W "Mutie" is also a popular insult amongst adolescents.
  
S The Entymions
K 
I The first known contact between FW and Entymion forces was when a fleet of
D Entymion ships was detected in 2346 by the 'Demon's Lair' outpost in the
  Deimos star system.  The Entymions have been tentatively identified as
R originating outside of the Local Group. However, while this would seem to
O imply that they possess an advanced form of hyperspace travel or a
W hyperspace booster, neither appears to be the case. In fact, all evidence
  seems to point to the Entymions lacking even conventional hyperspace
S engines! The Entymions apparently travel entirely at sublight velocities.
K They appear to be long-lived and very patient creatures, who don't seem to
I mind spending thirty or more years on each leg of a journey. That is not to
D say, however, that the Entymions have no interest in hyperspace technology.
  Intelligence reports indicate that they have been known to ask numerous
R questions about the Cetus Amicus hyperspace booster.
O 
W Creatures of vast, cool intellect, they are surprisingly good fighters and
  have never been seen to back-down in combat. Strangely enough, they treat
S each encounter between their kind and the Federated Worlds as if it were
K the first, leading some xenosociologists to speculate that the Entymions
I have no concept of war, hostilities, or even "grudges" as we know them. As
D a result, no state of war exists between the Federated Worlds and the
  Entymions, although a number of conflicts have taken place.
R 
O Priority One Report: Cybers
W 
  In recent months a new hostile force has been encountered in the Local
S Group. They are humanoid beings who have been extensively modified with
K biotechnical implants to become biomechanical beings commonly referred to
I as "Cybers". Although encounters have been few, the Cybers have, in every
D reported instance, been hostile to any and all governments and life forms,
  usually destroying the unfortunate few whom they have come face to face
R with. The single exception to this hostility are Aliens, which have
O reportedly been detected on Cyber vessels. The nature of this relationship
W is unknown.
  
S Cybers are extremely dangerous opponents, and it is better strategy to run
K than fight when confronted by them. All of their ships we have encountered
I thus far are equivalent to dreadnought class vessels, and very powerful.
D The Cybers themselves are cunning opponents, quick to respond, aggressive
  in the extreme, and uncompromising.
R 
O No one knows where the Cybers come from or what they want. However,
W intelligence reports indicate that they apparently have an extremely small
  presence in the Local Group: perhaps only a few dozen ships, and no known
S bases (except those of other races which they raid). No Cyber body has yet
K been captured so it has been thus far impossible to determine if they are
I modified humans of common descent to those on the Local Group and Home
D Cluster, which some biologists speculate must be the case. The two
  prevailing theories about the Cybers origin are:
R 
O     1.  They were a splinter colony in the Local Group who for some reason
W         chose to modify themselves biomechanically and have only recently
          made themselves known.
S 
K     2.  They are from "outside" the Local Group and arrived here either by
I         accident (unlikely) or through some kind of hyperspace booster.
D 
  
R Local Group Starchart - Updated
O 
W For the past century and a half the Local Group's boundaries were
  established its a rectangular volume of space 48 lightyears "wide" (X
S axis), 33 lightyears 'deep" (Y axis) and 34 Lightyears "high" (Z axis), for
K a total volume of 50,490 cubic Lightyears. In 2369, Tim Markarian, Dean of
I Astrophysics at Axia Polytech, proposed extending the Local Group's
D boundaries to encompass a cube 60x60x60 lightyears, centered on the star
  Hope. This new definition more than quadrupled the volume of the Local
R Group to 216,000 cubic lightyears, and added 27 new stars, bringing the
O total to 47. Not all of the 27 new stars have yet been visited, and so far
W only one of those few that have been visited has been identified as having
  a habitable planet (specifically, the red dwarf star LG-MD8, around which
S orbits the unsavory planet called Tuoles Laicr'mok garbage dump of the UDP
K and the home of the "Muties").
I 
D It is unlikely that most missions will stray beyond the established
  pre-2369 Local Group star systems, but for your future reference, and in
R the unlikely event that you are required to command a task force to some
O previously unexplored system, the newly updated map is not provided here.
W 
  
S 
K                         PART III: MISSION OVERVIEW
I 
D What the Game Is
  
R Having gotten your first sample of Rules of Engagement through the
O tutorial, you now have some idea of what the game is about and how it is
W played. This section provides brief descriptions about key aspects of the
  game, allowing you to form a better mental picture of the nature of your
S objectives in the game, the opposition your face, and what resources are
K available to you and your opponents.
I 
D 
  You as the Fleet Commander
R 
O Rules of Engagement is a role-playing game in which you take on the role of
W a Fleet Commander deployed to lead Federated Worlds forces in specific
  missions against enemy or rebel forces. Your overall objective is to
S advance your Fleet Commander.  This is accomplished by successfully
K completing missions, which raises the total score for the Commander. When
I certain scores are reached, the Commander is promoted.
D 
      NOTE: For detailed information about Fleet Commanders, see Appendix I.
R 
O 
W The Concept of the Mission
  
S A mission is a single, specific military operation. Each time you play a
K game you are engaged in a particular mission. In Rules of Engagement there
I are no broad "campaigns" of linked operations. Each mission stands on its
D own.
  
R In the mission you take the helm of the flagship of a group of Federated
O Worlds starships. The force under your command can consist of as few as one
W ship, and up into entire armadas of vessels.
  
S 
K Mission Locales
I 
D Each mission takes place in a particular solar system (also: star system),
  containing between one and two stars, and various numbers or planets,
R asteroid fields, outposts and waypoints. The system map is 4 x 4 billion
O kilometers, with an overall map area of 16 quintillion square kilometers.
W All game action takes place on a two-dimensional plane through the center
  of the system. You cannot collide with objects in the system, as they are
S treated as if just below the plane your ships, and the enemy, are on. Thus,
K when your ship appears to be flying through the sun or a planet, it is
I actually passing over it.
D 
  You cannot leave the system. Your ship's navigational subsystem has an
R inhibitor which will prevent your vessel from leaving the system map and
O venturing into the void of interstellar space.
W 
  A few things to know about the systems:
S 
K     The size and class of the star(s) in the system can effect your
I     communications systems. The hotter the star, the more interference
D     it creates. Furthermore, the closer you are to the star, the higher
      the interference.
R 
O     Asteroid fields are no menace to navigation, however, the more dense
W     an asteroid field is, the more difficult it is to scan outside it.
  
S     A ship caught in a dense asteroid field is at a disadvantage because
K     it may be effectively sensor-blind while opposing ships outside of
I     the field are probably still be able to see it.
D 
      Planets have no affect on your ship (although they may harbor
R     outposts).
O 
W 
  Time-Limits & Real-Time Missions
S 
K Some missions have time limits built in, forcing you to complete the
I mission within a certain time-frame. If you do not meet all of the
D objectives within a particular mission's time limit, you will have failed
  to successfully complete the mission, and the game will end.
R 
O The CHRONO readout in the 300 bar at the top of all of the game screens
W displays a continually updated mission clock, registering how many hours,
  minutes and seconds have passed since the mission began. The total mission
S lime remaining can be seen under the Objectives display on the DATA
K RETRIEVAL panel.
I 
D Unlike Omnitrend's Breach 2, in which time passes in 30 second "rounds",
  almost everything that happens in Rules of Engagement occurs in real-time.
R One second of time in the "real" world equals one second of game-time,
O which means, if you don't pay attention, you could suddenly find yourself
W having less than five minutes in which to get your ships to a point in
  space that would take ten minutes to reach at, maximum velocity, and thus
S lose the mission.
K 
I 
D E=MC^2. It's the Law
  
R According to Einstein's Special Theory of Relativity, no object in normal
O space can accelerate beyond the speed of light roughly 300,000 kilometers
W per second.  In the Universe games this limitation is circumvented by use
  of "hyperspace' engines, which allow ships to pop out of normal space in
S one location and, 6.8 days later, emerge at a location many lightyears
K away. However, hyperspace travel is impractical within a solar system (who
I wants to take 6.8 days to cross a distance you could travel in hours?), and
D thus all ships are trapped by the "lightspeed barrier".
  
R At maximum, the fastest ships in the game can reach 99% of lightspeed. All
O missiles travel at 99.9999% lightspeed. Enhanced Beam Weapons and commu-
W nications signals, being energy, can travel at lightspeed, but no faster.
  
S Now, 300,000 kilometers per second might sound fast (and it is), but it's
K still not infinitely fast, something you'll pick up on soon enough when you
I realize that it can take 3.7 hours for a message at that velocity to cross
D a 4 billion kilometer axis of the solar system map!
  
R The lightspeed limitation returns the "fog of war" aspect to space combat
O that most computer games and simulations seem to ignore. Simply put, you
W can't flash all over the map instantaneously, nor yell for help and expect
  the cavalry to come running right away.
S 
K 
I Captains
D 
  You have direct control of only the mission's flagship. All other ships
R under your command have their own Captains, whom you must manage and
O deploy. Using your ship's communications system, you can send orders to
W these Captains, instructing them to undertake various actions.
  
S One thing that is very important to understand is that each Captain has a
K distinct personality which will affect how he or she acts and responds to
I your orders. Some will attempt to meet mission objectives without awaiting
D orders from you, others won't budge without a direct order. Some will
  follow your orders to the letter, others won't listen to you at all. Some
R are clever tacticians, others have the IQ of a black hole. Some are so
O loyal that they will blow themselves to bits on your order, while others
W just don't give a damn about you, orders, or the Federated Worlds, and will
  surrender to hostile forces at the drop of a hat.
S 
K As a result, one of the most important aspects of a mission is to decide
I which Captain is right for what job. This is done by reviewing each
D Captain's docket, which can be accessed via your flagship's Data Retrieval
  system.
R 
O 
W Communications
  
S The Communications system is one of the six primary systems of your ship.
K Through it you deploy your forces and keep tabs on them. This system keeps
I track of messages received, and contains a list of orders which you can
D send to the Captains under your command. You can direct Captains to
  particular targets or patrols, or even contact the enemy and order them to
R surrender.
O 
W 
  Battle Groups
S 
K Deploying Captains individually can be time-consuming, particularly when
I you want several of them to do the same thing - like defend an outpost or
D attack a specific ship. This problem is alleviated by the formation of
  Battle Groups, in which two or more ships undertake actions as a unit.
R Battle Groups are formed by ordering one Captain to form a group, and then
O instructing other ships to join the group. Once the Group is formed, all of
W the ships in the group will act on whatever the Group Captain does, with
  the net result being that you can control many ships by sending orders to
S only one.
K 
I Naturally, this is not a perfect system, as, again, the personalities of
D given Captains come into play. Some Captains rebel against authority, and
  still others won't take orders from Captains who have less experience than
R they do. As a result, forming Battle Groups often requires even more
O attention to the personalities of the Captains than normal.
W 
  
S Enemies
K 
I In each mission you will find yourself facing a specific enemy force
D composed of a particular faction or race. Like a Captain under your
  command, these enemies have "group traits" which affect their actions and
R reactions. A particular enemy might be very aggressive, and would be more
O likely to attack your forces or outposts than less aggressive creatures.
W They might be exceptionally clever tacticians, but also possess poor
  diplomatic skills, thus making it unlikely they could convince neutral
S outposts to help them.
K 
I As with your Captains, a docket of information about your opponents is
D available from your DATA RETRIEVAL system.
  
R 
O Federated Worlds Ships (FWS)
W 
  All of the vessels under your command are ships of the Federated Worlds.
S There are six classes of ships, each potentially more powerful than the
K last (depending on how they are equipped and armed). The starship classes
I are: Transport, Scout, Destroyer, Cruiser, Heavy Cruiser, and Dreadnought. 
D In optimal configuration, Dreadnoughts are the most powerful ships in the
  fleet, and Transports the weakest. However, since some large warships are
R equipped with less than the best parts, sometimes a Dreadnought can end up
O being less capable than a Cruiser.
W 
  For detailed information on Federated Worlds ships, see Appendix III.
S 
K 
I Enemy Ships
D 
  Enemy forces have access to ships comparable to those in your forces'
R inventory.  They conform to the same six categories: Transport, Scout,
O Destroyer, Cruiser, Heavy Cruiser, and Dreadnought.
W 
  
S Navigation
K 
I Another of your ship's six key systems. Most navigation is a fully
D automatic process, although manual control is possible. Through your ship's
  navigational system you can keep track of objects and ships in the system,
R and with the touch of a button probe, intercept, or chase any one of them.
O 
W 
  Combat
S 
K This involves two or more opposed ships moving within one million
I kilometers and firing on each other. All ships are armed with a form of EBW
D (Enhanced Beam Weapon), and some may also carry varying numbers and types
  of missiles.
R 
O Ships are protected by defensive energy shields, which minimize damage from
W hostile fire. However, the shield system can itself be damaged and
  destroyed, and even the best shields are not 100% effective at preventing
S damage. Failure to raise the shields in combat is a sure way to invite
K destruction.
I 
D Ships are "destroyed" when all six of their primary systems have been
  rendered totally inoperative and irreparable.
R 
O 
W Damage
  
S Every ship has six primary systems, each of which can sustain damage.
K Undamaged systems work with 100% effectiveness. As a system is damaged,
I the functions related to that system begin to fail, until eventually the
D related functions become inoperable. A system that is at 0% operational
  capacity is considered destroyed and cannot be repaired. Damage is
R sustained in combat with hostile forces, the one exception being when
O communications equipment sustains damage when you push the system to its
W limits.
  
S If a system is at least partially operational, it can be repaired. However,
K the more damaged a system is, the longer it takes for your ship's damage
I control teams to deal with the problems. Using the Damage Control settings
D on your ship's DATA RETRIEVAL panel, you can distribute your repair
  personnel to priority systems.  Furthermore, docking with an outpost may be
R helpful, as many outposts are capable of fixing your systems more quickly
O and completely than your own crew.
W 
  Partially damaged systems lose functionality as follows:
S 
K Communications      Reduced comm range and interference tolerance
I                     Reduced sensor range
D                     Possible loss of sensor probe operation
  
R Computer            Loss of information on Data Retrieval displays
O 
W Life Support        If below 50%, crew will begin to suffocate
  
S Shields             Reduced shield recharging rate
K 
I Weapons             Reduced EBW power
D 
  Drives              Reduced maximum speed and acceleration
R 
O 
W Boarding
  
S Some missions may require you to capture an enemy vessel. To capture a
K vessel you must board it and seize control of a certain percentage of
I critical systems. To board an enemy ship you must first destroy its shield
D and drive systems, and then move your ship within 5,000 kilometers range.
  
R Boarding is normally a fully automatic process, however, if you have Breach
O 2, the Interlocking Game System allows Rules of Engagement to lock into
W that game and utilize it for such ship boarding sequences (see "Part VIII:
  The Interlocking Game System").
S 
K 
I Outposts
D 
  Outposts are bases. They can be planet-bound facilities or free- floating
R space stations. Each outpost has two levels of sophistication of interest
O to starship commanders, related to the outpost's ability to repair
W starships and re-supply their missile stocks. The higher the
  sophistication, the more help the outpost can provide.
S 
K Outposts can have one of three alliances: to you, the enemy, or neutral.
I 
D 
  Friendly
R 
O (FW) outposts will come to your aid if your dock with them, enemy outposts
W will aid enemy ships, and neutral outposts may or may not help either side
  (depending on the diplomatic skill of the ship commander wishing to dock).
S 
K If an outpost is hostile, the only option you have is to capture it. If a
I neutral outpost denies you docking permission, you may also attempt to
D capture it.  Capturing an outpost involves a procedure similar to that used
  in capturing an enemy ship, except that only the outpost's shields must be
R disabled before boarding, and your ship must move within 1,000 kilometers.
O Naturally, enemy forces can attempt to capture neutral or Federated Worlds
W outposts as well, and will probably attempt to retake their own facilities
  that you have occupied.
S 
K Capturing a particular enemy outpost may actually be set as an objective
I for a particular mission.
D 
  As with boarding an enemy ship, if you have Breach 2, the Interlocking Game
R System allows Rules of Engagement to lock into that game and utilize it for
O such outpost boarding sequences (see Part VIII of this manual).
W 
  
S Mission Briefing
K 
I Each mission contains a briefing that you can review at any time by
D accessing your ship's DATA RETRIEVAL panel. The briefing will detail the
  background of the mission, and may also contain hints on how to deal with
R the enemies and avoid potential pitfalls.
O 
W 
  Objectives
S 
K One or more objectives will have to be met in order to complete a given
I mission. The objectives for a given mission are available for review at any
D time on your ship's DATA RETRIEVAL panel. Those objectives that are checked
  off have been met. A complete list of possible objectives follows:
R 
O All Ships to Waypoint 1 - All surviving FW ships must reach Waypoint 1
W (X01). If more than one objective is required, this is always the last one
  that must be met, as it represents the final destination of all your
S forces.
K 
I Ship n to Waypoint n - You must safely guide the specified ship to the
D specified waypoint.
  
R One Ship to Each Waypoint - Your Fleet must "control" strategic points in
O space. One FW ship must be located at each waypoint in the system in order
W for the mission to end successfully.
  
S      NOTE: Any one of the preceding three waypoint-related objectives maybe
K            in a given mission, but only one. You can't very well have one
I            ship at each waypoint and also get all ships to the first
D            waypoint, can you?
  
R Capture Outpost n - At the end of the mission the specified outpost
O (-outpost ID) must be under the control of your forces.
W 
  Capture Enemy Ship n - Your forces must disable and then board/capture the
S specified enemy ship (-enemy ship ID). Since ships cannot be recaptured by
K the enemy (they are rendered dead when boarded),this can be done at any
I time during the mission.
D 
  Neutralize n% of Enemy Fleet - Your forces must successfully neutralize
R (either capture or destroy) the specified percentage (n = percentage) of
O enemy ships in the system.
W 
  Control n % of Outposts - At the end of the mission your forces must
S simultaneously control the specified percentage (n = percentage) of
K outposts in the system in which the mission takes place.
I 
D It sometimes gets tricky trying to figure out in which order to carry out
  these objectives, but the simplest approach is to deal with those that
R cannot be changed by enemy actions first (like destroying ships) and then
O deal with "final position" objectives last (like moving ships to particular
W waypoints).
  
S As stated earlier, some missions also have a time limit. If a time limit is
K set, when the limit is reached, the mission will end. Therefore, it is
I important to fulfill the mission objectives before this limit is reached.
D 
  
R Skill Levels
O 
W There are three skill levels you can play, Beginner, Intermediate, and
  Advanced. The differences are as follows:
S 
K Beginner
I      - Missiles and EBW's from FW ships never miss (unless fired outside
D         of correct range or jammed).
       - Enemy missiles and EBW's do only 50% normal damage.
R      - FW ships have unlimited visibility of enemy ships.
O      - When pausing game, screen does not blank.
W      - Shields raise automatically when hit.
  
S Intermediate
K      - Missiles and EBW's from FW ships are subject to the normal weapons'
I         accuracy.
D      - Enemy missiles and EBW's do only 75% normal damage.
       - Enemy ships are only detectable when within sensor range of an FW
R         ship.
O      - When pausing game, the screen blacks out.
W      - Shields must be raised manually.
  
S Advanced
K     Same as Intermediate, except:
I      - Enemy missiles and EBW's do normal damage.
D 
  If you successfully played the same mission at both Beginner and Advanced
R levels, and took identical action with identical results in both games, you
O would notice that you received a lower score for the Beginner game. This is
W done to balance for the many advantages gained in playing the Beginner
  level, which is easier than an Intermediate game and much easier than
S playing a game at Advanced level.
K 
I 
D Saving a Game in Progress
  
R You have the ability to save a game at any time simply by activating the
O disk icon in the game's 300 bar. This means that you can stop playing at
W any point and resume the game later.
  
S In fact, when using the IGS you can save the game from within Breach 2, and
K when you tell Rules of Engagement to resume the game it automatically
I returns you to your position within Breach 2! (See Part VIII of this manual
D for more details on the IGS.)
  
R 
O Ending a Game
W 
  A game will end when:
S      - all of the mission objectives are met (win)
K      - an objective you were meant to capture is destroyed (lose)
I      - your flagship is destroyed (lose)
D      - your Fleet Commander is killed in a boarding action (lose)
       - you end a game by quitting and deleting it (lose)
R      - your flagship surrenders to enemy forces (lose)
O 
W If you win a game, your Fleet Commander's statistics will be updated. If
  you lose the game, the game file is erased and the Fleet Commander stats
S will be updated to reflect the loss.
K 
I Note that after winning or losing a mission, a mission summary will appear.
D After reading this summary, pressing any key will return you to the last
  game panel you were operating. The mission clock will be frozen, and all
R activity will have ceased. This allows you to examine the final positions
O and status of your ships, read any unread communications, and examine any
W other data in any of the game panels. Once you have finished, activate the
  disk icon button to exit the mission and save your Fleet Commander's stats.
S 
K 
I Playing With Other IGS Products
D 
  The Interlocking Game System is a unique method of allowing separate games
R to combine with one another to form one huge game. Rules of Engagement is
O able to load Omnitrend's previous IGS game, Breach 2, as if the two were
W one large game. It is possible that in future Rules of Engagement may be
  able to load or be loaded by other IGS modules, meaning that your role
S playing character (the Fleet Commander in the case of Rules of Engagement)
K can adventure through many games.
I 
D Currently, Rules of Engagement is an IGS controlling module, which loads
  non-controlling modules (like Breach 2). Check with your dealer or contact
R Mindcraft for information on other IGS games.
O 
W      NOTE:  A detailed description of the IGS system can be found
              in part VIII of this manual.
S 
K 
I Creating Your Own Missions
D 
  You can create new missions or modify existing ones by using the various
R 'builder' panels accessible from the Rules of Engagement GAME/MISSION
O menu. Part VII of this manual documents the builder panels and their use.
W 
  
S Where to Go from Here
K 
I By now you are probably wondering when you will be able to play a game
D other than the tutorial mission. well, now that you have an overview of
  various aspects of Rules of Engagement, it's time to go on to the specifics
R of playing and controlling the game. The next section of this manual ("Part
O IV: The CCSI Interface") documents the game's interface, describing not
W only how to operate it, but the most efficient way in which to use it.
  Following that, "Part V: The Main Panels" documents each of the actual game
S panels, giving you button-by-button and function-by-function information. 
K Finally, "Part VI: Tactics" documents tactics, strategies, and playing tips
I which will help you learn the game and successfully complete missions.
D 
  
R 
O                         PART IV: THE CCSI INTERFACE
W 
  Command and Control - Overview
S 
K During the brief peace that existed during the period of the Local Group
I Unification Organization (2368-2374 CE [Common Era]), the Federated Worlds
D Armed Forces (FWAF) suffered from a number of critical budget cutbacks
  which seriously affected the operational readiness of Federated Worlds
R defenses. Many starships were decommissioned, and a large percentage of
O FWAF combat personnel were discharged or retired. During this period, the
W only major new military expenditures were related to refitting key
  starships with new systems. One major program undertaken by the FWAF during
S this period was the complete overhaul of the computer and control systems
K of all combat-ready starships. This was done to keep up with the latest
I innovations in related technology. Several years earlier, (2364CE) a
D contract was awarded to the Intelligence Corporation to develop a new
  Command & Control Systems Interface (CCSI) which would become the standard
R on all Federated Worlds starships. The final specification produced by
O Intelligence was then incorporated into all CCSI related computer system
W produced for the FWAF - including those produced by manufacturers other
  than Intelligence.
S 
K Past experience had taught the FWAF that simplification of CCSI systems was
I of vital importance. The old CCSI standard had worked very well, but over
D many years its deficiencies had become increasingly apparent. What the FWAF
  sought was a fully integrated system in which the data displays and
R controls were one and the same. Furthermore, it specified that the overall
O number of controls be reduced. Intelligence's design reflects these
W concerns.
  
S 
K Interface Basics
I 
D When you sit down in front of a CCSI panel for the first time you are
  struck by the simplicity of it. Gone are the rows of data displays, buttons
R and keyboard banks. In their place is a single glassy panel, on which is
O displayed a digital representation of a control board. This is a
W touch-screen which is operated by pressing on the display's simulated
  "buttons" and touching or "dragging" other controls.  Since the controls
S are part of the display rather than separate equipment, the system can mix
K information displays with the controls themselves, allowing the user to
I keep his/her/its eyes focused on the data at all times.  This cuts down on
D response time, and, since related controls can be displayed with
  mode-specific information, there is less chance of confusion over which
R controls relate to what function.
O 
W Furthermore, in the interest of preventing confusion over distinct and
  unrelated functions, the CCSI displays only related controls at any one
S time. If you are accessing communications functions, the navigational
K controls are not displayed. Likewise, if you are reading the docket of one
I of the Captains under your command, the weaponry systems are not shown.
D 
  
R Controlling the CCSI
O 
W The FWAF computer systems work with multifunction touch-sensitive displays.
  Chances are your actual personal computer isn't this sophisticated, so you
S must operate the interface using a mouse and/or keyboard. Control of the
K CCSI panels is covered in this section, with operational details for both
I mouse and keyboard users. "Pressing" a button in the lingo of these
D instructions means to click on it with the mouse or press the keyboard
  equivalent.
R 
O 
W Button Symbol Table
  
S Key equivalents are listed on most buttons as the overscored letter or
K symbol. In some cases the button symbols themselves represent keys. The
I following is a list of button symbols and their keyboard equivalents:
D 
               SYMBOL        KEYBOARD EQUIVALENT
R 
O              0 to 9        number keys (on the main keyboard)
W              F1 to F10     function keys
               +             + (plus) key
S              -             - (minus) key
K              LEFT          left-arrow key (cursor pad)
I              RIGHT         right-arrow key (cursor pad)
D              UP            up-arrow key (cursor pad)
               DOWN          down-arrow key (cursor pad)
R              7 (PAD)       Home key
O              1 (PAD)       End key
W              9 (PAD)       PageUp key
               3 (PAD)       PageDown key
S 
K      NOTE: When the manual refers to the PageUp, PageDown, Home, and End
I            "buttons" or "controls", the on-screen representation of the
D            button will contain the symbols displayed in the table above.
  
R 
O A Sample Panel
W 
  Each CCSI panel is made up of several distinct "parts", some or all of
S which may change as you access different systems.
K  
I 
D PANELS & PANEL NUMBERS
  
R A "panel" in CCSI terms is a large group of related controls, such as
O controls associated with Data Retrieval or equipping starships.  Groups of
W related sub-functions within a panel are known as "sub-panels".
  
S Each and every panel display has an identifying number. These numbers are
K always three-digit values. The first digit in the number tells you
I something about the panel you are working with. For instance, all shipboard
D CCSI panels are of the 300 series, meaning that the number of any such
  panel will begin with a 3, as with Navigation being panel 301 and Tactical
R being panel 303.
O 
W Panel series are as follows:
  
S              000 series     Usurper boxes
K              100 series     Game/Mission
I              200 series     Mission Builder
D              300 series     Ship CCSI
               400 series     FWSF Marine deployment
R 
O 
W MASTER CONTROL BAR
  
S This bar contains those controls and displays common to all related panels.
K For example, the Master Control Bar on a starship panel contains the
I mission clock and all of the controls necessary to access various systems.
D This bar is always present, while separate control panels displayed below
  it can and do change. Master Control Bars are always green (cyan in CGA),
R although control buttons and displays within it can be other colors.
O 
W 
  ACTION BUTTONS
S 
K Action buttons are controls which do something. Activating one has an imme-
I diate result, such as changing a mode or firing a missile. They represent
D "buttons" of the type you "press/touch". Using an action button as simple
  as clicking on it with the mouse or pressing the equivalent key on your
R computer keyboard.
O 
W Action buttons are easily identified because they are always rectangular
  and magenta in color. The bright color indicates that these are controls
S rather than a inactive part of the display.
K 
I There are two types of action buttons. The first is the "trigger" type,
D which activates a particular function and then deactivates it. Trigger
  buttons will "flash" white a few times when pressed and then return to
R their normal color. The second type of action button is the "switch" type,
O which, when pressed, remains active until another function deactivates it
W or it is selected again to toggle it "off".  When such a switch is "on" it
  remains white to indicate its status.
S 
K A few examples are in order. A FIRE button is a "trigger" type, firing a
I weapon and then stopping. On the other hand, an ACQUIRE button which locks
D the weapons system onto a target or a GET button that calls up another
  display is a "switch".
R 
O In some cases, such as when two or more action buttons call up wholly
W different displays, only one button may be active/highlighted at any one
  time. In other cases, such as when choosing what to display on a map, many
S related action buttons can be active at the same time.
K 
I 
D SELECTION BUTTONS
  
R Selection buttons differ from action buttons in that selection buttons
O don't actually do anything in of themselves. They are used to make a choice
W from a selection of two or more items which will be acted on by associated
  action buttons. For example, on a starship's Tactical panel there is a Beam
S Width control with three selection buttons (wide beam, normal beam, and
K pinpoint fire).  The act of selecting any one of these buttons does nothing
I by itself, as you are simply telling the CCSI which option you wish to use
D when you next press the diction button (FIRE).
  
R Selection Buttons are always blue in color and a highlighted item is
O displayed as a lighter blue (cyan and white in CGA). In all cases selection
W buttons can be clicked on using the mouse. When using the keyboard in a few
  modes it is necessary to use the arrow keys or related "scroll" action
S buttons to highlight the selection (notably on standard item selectors [see
K below] and on two sub-menus in the Tactical panel).
I 
D Generally, when in clusters of two or more related selections, only one
  selection button may be active/highlighted at any one time.
R 
O 
W STANDARD SELECTOR
  
S When you are offered a list of items to choose from, the usual way of
K presenting the list is through a standard selector. The selector features
I numerous selector buttons, each of which can contain an item (all items are
D listed alphabetically). The current selection is whichever item is
  highlighted. To select an item with the mouse, you merely click on it. To
R select an item with the keyboard, simply press the UP and DOWN keys to move
O the highlighter bar to the item you want. In the case of side-by-side
W selector lists, you must use the LEFT and RIGHT keys to move through the
  right-hand list.
S 
K (Furthermore, on your ship's communications panel, scrolling the
I highlighted item on the standard selector is accomplished by use of the
D Home and End keys.)
  
R If a list contains more items than can be displayed at one time, you can
O press on the "page-forward" and "page-back" buttons alongside the list.
W Keyboard users will have to press the keyboard equivalent listed on these
  buttons (it varies from panel to panel).
S 
K As with all selection buttons, simply highlighting an item out of the list
I will not do anything until you press a related action button.
D 
  
R SCROLLER SELECTOR
O 
W In some places, the standard selector becomes impractical because of
  limited display space. In such cases, a "scroller" selector is employed,
S which works somewhat differently from the standard selector. A scroller
K selector usually lists only three items at any one time, with the second
I item being automatically highlighted. By pressing on the scroll-up and
D scroll-down action buttons (or pressing their key equivalents), the list of
  items will scroll, allowing you to place any item in the list on the
R highlighted bar. The highlighted item is the choice to be acted on by
O associated action buttons.
W 
  You cannot "click" on any item in a scroller selector, as there are no
S "buttons" to pick. The scroller list is gray with a white highlight instead
K of the usual selection button colors of blue with a light-blue highlighter
I (cyan and white in CGA).
D 
  Scroller sectors sometimes have related action buttons in a bar just above
R and/or below the selector itself.
O 
W (On the Tactical panel there is a miniature version of the scroller
  selector which lists only one item at a time.)
S 
K 
I THERMOMETER SCALE
D 
  These are used to set values that require a wide possible range or fine-
R adjustments of a value. The scale bar represents the potential range of the
O value, and the small arrowhead parallel to the scale indicates the current
W value's position along the scale. These scales are used throughout the
  program, for everything from setting map view radii to adjusting the power
S level of your weapons.
K 
I To operate such meters, simply move the arrowhead pointer along the scale
D until the desired value appears (either parallel to the scale or in a value
  readout nearby). To adjust the setting with the mouse, click and hold the
R mouse button on the arrowhead and drag the arrowhead along the scale. To
O adjust the value with the keyboard, press the indicated 'move' key once to
W start the arrowhead moving, and press the key again to stop it.
  
S These keys start moving the arrowhead slowly, but the longer the arrowhead
K moves the faster it goes. This acceleration makes it possible to move
I across large ranges quickly, but can make fine-positioning problematic. To
D avoid this when making small adjustments, quickly tap the arrowhead move
  keys on and off, which will not give the arrowhead time to accelerate.
R 
O      NOTE: In many cases, these scales are rather 'coarse', and
W            fine positioning using the mouse is impossible. Mouse users
             can use the keyboard commands to fine-tune their settings on
S            such scales.
K 
I 
D VALUE READOUT
  
R Several types of these readouts are seen on CCSI panels. Their purpose is
O to list information about settings or related controls.
W 
  For example, a value readout alongside a thermometer scale for setting EBW
S power would display the percentage of hitting power selected (000% to
K 100%) or, one alongside CHASE an INTERCEPT controls would identify the
I item you are pursuing.
D 
  The most common value readouts are small boxes, pinkish-orange in color
R (cyan in CGA), which are usually just large enough to hold the values to be
O displayed. The second type or value readout simply displays white numbers
W on black backgrounds.
  
S 
K STATUS METERS
I 
D A status meter is a bar that, when at maximum length, indicates that the
  item in question is at 100%. As the bar shrinks, it indicates the current
R percentage.  Such bars are used in the Master Control Bar to indicate the
O approximate operational capability of each of your ship's six primary
W systems.  Similar readouts appear on the Tactical panel to show you the
  operational capability of the systems of targeted ships and outposts, and
S one is used to show the power-up status of the EBWs.
K 
I 
D USURPER BOXES
  
R Occasionally, when you access a particular mode or function a yellow and
O green bordered (cyan and white in CGA) subpanel will pop up. This is known
W as a "usurper" box because it usurps control from whatever panel you are
  working with. When a usurper box is present you cannot work with any
S controls outside of the usurper's own. You must send the usurper box away
K (usually by operating a CANCEL, ABORT, DONE, or OK button) before you can
I again work with other controls.
D 
  Usurper boxes are most commonly used for alert messages and warnings.
R Other time then act as sub-menus, providing extra options to those
O displayed on the main panel you are working with.
W 
  If a usurper box features no action buttons (magenta), such as when the
S "One moment please..." messages appear, then the box is under system
K control and will automatically disappear when the computer is ready to
I proceed.
D 
  Usurper boxes are easy to identify because they tend to pop up in the
R middle of the screen, and are bordered primarily in yellow with a green bar
O across the top.  The green bar will contain a three-digit panel number,
W always starting with 0 (zero), as with 001 or 015.
  
S 
K TEXT EDITING FIELDS
I 
D There isn't much need for typing in Rules of Engagement, but occasionally
  you are required to enter a name for a game, mission, character, etc. In
R these situations, you will be confronted with a text editing field. To type
O in the field you must activate the associated action button (like NAME,
W EDIT NAME or such), which will result in the appearance of a thin
  rectangular frame in the text field, inside which is a slim vertical
S cursor. Each text editing field can hold up to 18 characters of text. You
K can use the Backspace key on your computer keyboard to delete existing
I text. The cursor and delete keys have no effect. Most common alpha-numeric
D keys can be used in such fields. All text will appear in uppercase
  (capital) letters.
R 
O To exit a text editing field, simply click your mouse anywhere on the
W screen, or press the Enter/Return key on your keyboard.
  
S      NOTE: The large "dossier" type text fields in the builder panels
K            work differently, and are documented in Part VII of this manual.
I 
D 
  
R                           PART V: THE MAIN PANELS
O 
W How to...
  
S This section explains each and every panel in the game, with the exception
K of the builder panels (see Part VII). Each panel's purpose and functioning
I is detailed.
D 
  Screen buttons are listed in uppercase bold text, with the key equivalent
R listed, in parenthesis, immediately following the button text, as in: "use
O BUTTON (B) to..."
W 
  Please note that many options will bring up alert messages, such as "are
S you sure you want to delete...", and the usurper boxes bearing these
K messages are not always noted in the text because, as a rule, what to do
I when one appears is fairly self-evident.
D 
  Each panel is listed by number and name. Operation of the controls on these
R panels are as described in "Part IV: The CCSI Interface", unless otherwise
O noted.
W 
  This is a Master Control Bar which appears only on the starting menu screen
S of the game (Panel 101).  It contains only three controls, all action
K buttons (magenta); they are as follows:
I 
D HELP (F1)
       This button brings up an enlarged version of the standard usurper
R      message box (001) which briefly explains how to create and start a
O      game. The only button on this box is an OK (O) control to exit.
W 
  INFO (I)
S      This calls up usurper box 000, which lists the game's copyright
K      information and credits. There are two buttons in this box, the first,
I      MORE (M), cycles to the next page of credits, and the second, DONE
D      (D), exits the box. The last page of credits features only the DONE
       button.
R 
O QUIT (Q)
W      This quits the program. When you select it, you are asked if you
       really want to leave the game, and your options are YES (Y) and
S      NO (N).
K 
I 
D This menu dominates the majority of the game's opening screen, and provides
  access to all aspects of Rules of Engagement. From here you can create and
R edit Fleet Commanders, start games, and access the mission
O builders/editors. Along the left side of the panel are eight action buttons
W divided into three categories. The categories are:
  
S GAMES
K      Options related to existing (saved) game files.
I 
D NEW GAME
       Options related to the making of new games files and the creation and
R      handling of Fleet Commander characters.
O 
W BUILDER
       Options under this are related to mission elements and accessing the
S      mission builder panels.
K 
I Initially, none of the action buttons in these categories are activated,
D and a large FWAF logo dominates the screen. When any of the 101 panel
  action buttons are used, this logo disappears (and will not reappear unless
R you play and exit a game or restart the program.)
O 
W Only one of these eight buttons can be active at one time.
  
S When any of these action buttons are selected, a large selector, listing
K all items related to that mode, becomes "linked" to that button. Operation
I of this selector is like all standard selectors; click the mouse on, or use
D UP and DOWN to highlight, the item you want to act upon. Use the PageUp and
  PageDown buttons to page through long listings.
R 
O At the bottom-right of the selector are action buttons representing the
W options related to the current items listed. Most of these selector buttons
  will act on the item highlighted, although a few (notably "create" and
S "make" buttons) will add new items to the listing rather than acting on the
K selected one.
I 
D Following is a description of each of the buttons and the category they
  fall into:
R 
O EXISTING (X)
W      This button is the only item under the GAMES bracket.  When
       highlighted, this button brings up a listing of all existing game
S      files. These include games newly created and not yet started, as well
K      as games saved in progress. Each game is listed by the name you gave
I      it, and the mission being played is displayed to the right of the
D      game name.
  
R      You have two options in this mode. The first option, DELETE (D),
O      removes whatever existing game file is highlighted in the list. When a
W      game is deleted, the Fleet Commander used in that game is removed
       from the game file, placed back on the "available" list, and the game 
S      itself is erased.
K 
I      The second option, PLAY (P), loads the highlighted game file and
D      begins game play (jumping directly to panel 304 if the game has not
       been previously played and saved in another mode).
R 
O 
W FLEET CMDR (F)
       When highlighted, this button brings up a listing of all existing
S      Fleet Commanders, listing their names and status. A commander whose
K      name is followed by "AVAILABLE" is ready to use in a new game. If the
I      name is followed by a "N/A" (Not Available) flag, the Commander is
D      involved in an existing game and cannot be used in a new game or
       deleted until the game he/she is involved in is completed or deleted.
R 
O      There are four possible actions you can take with regard to the Fleet
W      Commander listing, the controls for which are all clustered at the    
       bottom-right of the selector.
S 
K CONVERT (V) will read all Breach 2 Squad Leaders in the user-selectable
I      directory and convert them to Rules of Engagement Fleet Commander
D      characters (see Appendix VI for details on operating this feature).
  
R DELETE (D) will remove the selected Commander from the list permanently.
O      You will prompted "Are you sure...?" before the deletion is carried
W      out. If you attempt to delete a Commander that is currently involved
       in an existing game, you will be notified: "That Fleet Commander is
S      currently commanding a game. You must delete the game first."
K 
I EXAMINE (E) calls up a box which lists information about the selected
D      commander, including, name, rank, vital statistics, and commendations.
      
R 
O CREATE (C) does not act on the highlighted item; it creates a new Fleet
W      Commander.  When you answer YES (Y) to the "Are you sure...?" prompt,
       usurper box 009 appears, in which you name your character and select
S      his/her appearance.
K 
I 
D 009 OPERATION
  
R Selecting NAME (N) on this box causes a text editing frame and cursor to
O appear in the FLEET CMDR NAME field, where you can type in a name up to 18
W characters in length (see "Part IV: The CCSI - Interface" for details on
  text editing fields).  When you have completed the name, click the mouse
S anywhere on the screen or press Enter/Return on your keyboard.
K 
I Selecting NEXT (X) cycles through the six different options for Fleet
D Commander appearance. When both the name and appearance are to your liking,
  selecting CREATE (C) on the box will exit to 101 and add your new character
R to the Commander listing. If you decide you don't want a new Commander.
O ABORT (O) will exit without creating a character.
W 
  CREATE (T)
S      This splits the large selector horizontally and lists all existing
K      missions and Fleet Commanders so that you can create a new game file.
I      To create a game, highlight the name of the mission your want to play
D      in the first column and the name of the Commander you wish to use in
       the second column.
R 
O      KEYBOARD NOTE: In the second column of the selector in this mode, use
W      the LEFT and RIGHT keys on your keyboard to move the highlighter up
       and down the Commander list, and the indicated + and - keys to page
S      through the listing (if there are more than 15 selections).
K 
I      Once you have selected a mission and a Commander, activating MAKE
D      GAME (G) will open a small dialog box (010) in which you must name
       the game and select a difficulty level.
R 
O 
W 010 OPERATION
         
S The EDIT NAME (N) button allows you to enter/edit the game name (see Part
K IV for details on text editing fields). When you have completed the name,
I click the mouse anywhere on the screen or press Enter/Return on your
D keyboard. Three blue selector buttons provide choices for game difficulty.
  The difficulty button highlighted when you use DONE (D) to make the game
R file sets the difficulty level. BEGINNER (B), INTERMEDIATE (I), and
O ADVANCED (V). (See Skill Levels in Part III of this manual for details on
W mission difficulties and how they affect playing the game and the Fleet
  Commander character's score).
S 
K 
I BUILDER BRACKET
D 
  The remainder of the buttons on panel 101 are related to the BUILDER
R section of the program, which allows you to edit existing missions and
O mission elements or create new ones. The actual functioning of the panels
W called by each of these buttons is documented in Part VII of this manual.
  However, in brief, here is what each button will list and allow you to
S access:
K 
I CAPTAINS (A)
D 
  FW Captains - the commanders of ships in missions.
R 
O SHIPS(S)
W 
  FW starships, commanded by either the Fleet Commander or a FW Captain.
S 
K RACES (R)
I 
D Enemy forces/alien races, who are your opponents in missions.
  
R SYSTEMS (S)
O 
W The solar systems in which missions take place.
  
S MISSIONS (M)
K 
I The missions you undertake when playing the game.
D 
  When any builder button is active, the selector lists all items of that
R type. The selector options for all builder items are identical:
O 
W DELETE (D)    Delete the highlighted item in the current list.
  
S EDIT (E)      Enter the selected builder panel and edit the highlighted
K               item in the current list.
I 
D CREATE (C)    Enter the selected builder panel and create a new item to be
                placed in the current list.
R 
O This is a Master Control Bar which appears above all of the in-game
W starship control panels (301-304). It contains several important readouts
  and the controls which provide access to all other panel modes.
S 
K The 300 bar contains five large action buttons and three smaller ones, each
I of which contains an icon. Of the five large buttons, only one of the first
D four can highlighted at any one time. The fifth large button (containing
  the disk icon) and three small ones to the far right are of the trigger
R switch type, activating and immediately deactivating themselves.
O 
W      KEYBOARD NOTE: The action buttons in the 300 bar do not
       have key equivalents listed on-button, however, they do all
S      have keyboard equivalents. Each button is triggered by a
K      function key, starting with F1 and ending with F8. The left most
I      button is F1,the second is F2, and so on.
D 
  Starting at the left end of the bar and moving to the right, the five large
R icons are:
O 
W SEXTANT (F1)
  
S When highlighted, this button brings up your ship's NAVIGATION panel (301),
K from which you can steer your ship, probe items in the vicinity, and
I consider your strategy.
D 
  ANTENNA (F2)
R 
O When highlighted, this button brings up your ship's COMMUNICATIONS panel.
W Immediately to the right of the icon, but still in the button, is a
  two-digit number which will usually read "00". This readout displays the
S total number of messages, tip to a maximum of 99, received by the Comm
K system since you last accessed it if at all). When you access the
I COMMUNICATION panel, this number resets to 00.
D 
  CROSSHAlR (F3)
R 
O When highlighted, this button brings up the TACTICAL (303) panel, which
W includes all weapons and defensive systems controls, and from which you
  launch all attacks and fight all battles.
S 
K CCSI PANEL (F4)
I 
D When highlighted, this button brings up the DATA RETRIEVAL (304) panel in
  whatever mode it was last in (there are eight sub-modes). See the
R description of panel 304 for details.
O 
W DISK(F5)
  
S This icon is a trigger button which allows you to save the game and exit
K the mission.
I 
D When activated during a mission, it brings up a usurper box which asks, "Do
  you want to save your current game position?", with the options being: YES
R (Y) saves the game as it stands and exits to panel 101, so you can resume
O later where you left off; NO (N) exits to 101 without saving the current
W position, so that when you restart the game it will resume at the beginning
  of the mission or at the last place you did save the position; CANCEL (C)
S aborts the exit routine and returns immediately to the game.
K 
I When activated after the successful or unsuccessful completion of a
D mission, it will exit the mission and update your Fleet Commander's stats
  accordingly.
R 
O 
W SYSTEM STATUS METERS
  
S Immediately to the right of the DISK button is a small readout featuring
K six letters, above each of which is a thin bar/meter. These represent the
I status of each of your ship's six primary systems. If the status meter for
D a system reaches the top of the 300 bar, that system is 100% operational.
  Each time a system sustains an additional 10% of damage, the meter's height
R slips a notch. Once a meter is completely depleted, the system in question
O is 0% operational, and technically "destroyed". (See "Part VI: Tactics" for
W details on system damage and damage control.) Below each meter is a letter
  identifying the system represented by that particular meter. The list of
S letters read "CPLSWD" and stands for:
K 
I              C       Communications
D              P       comPuter
               L       Life support
R              S       Shields
O              W       Weapons
W              D       Drive/propulsion
  
S 
K CHRONO
I 
D The readout under this label is the ship's "mission chronometer", a clock
  which shows the elapsed mission time in the following format:
R 
O                     HOURS:Minutes:SECONDS.
W 
  This clock is always running unless the game is paused or you have accessed
S a panel with its own clock (such as 401 MARINE DEPLOYMENT when boarding
K an outpost or ship). The default is for the clock to run at realtime speed,
I with one second of gametime equaling one second of realtime. This can be
D changed by using the slowtime and speedtime controls << and >> described
  below. (The CHRONO readout may freeze momentarily when you switch panels or
R modes. This is done so that you are not out of control of the mission
O during the time your personal computer is busy loading graphics or other
W data.)
  
S Time X n
K This readout shows the current rate of gametime versus realtime passage,
I with n representing the multiplication factor of gametime. Gametime
D defaults to realtime (x1), where one second of gametime equals one second
  of realtime. At almost any time this can be changed, up or down, doubled to
R two (x2), four (x4), eight (x8), sixteen (x16), and finally thirty-two
O times realtime (x32) (where each second of realtime equals 32 seconds of
W game time).
  
S The TIME X n factor is controlled by the three small action buttons
K immediately above the TIME X readout. They are described next.
I 
D << (F6)
  
R This button is a trigger which, when activated, immediately divides the
O current gametime multiplication factor in half. For example, if the
W gametime setting is at x8 before you activate the << button, it will read
  x4 after you have activated it.  The minimum gametime rate is x1.
S 
K Rightclicking on << (Shift-F6) immediately jumps the speed back to realtime
I (x1) regardless of the current rate.
D 
  || (F7)
R 
O This button toggles the PAUSE mode on and off. When highlighted, it freezes
W the game and chronometer, as well as disables all other buttons and
  controls.
S      
K      NOTE:  In actual combat, you would not be able to stop time in
I             the heat of battle and leisurely weigh your options. Thus, at
D             Intermediate and Advanced difficulty, pausing the game results
              in the screen being cleared of everything but the 300 bar.
R             At Beginner difficulty the screen is not cleared when the game
O             is paused.
W 
  >> (F8)
S 
K This button is a trigger which, when activated, immediately doubles the
I current gametime multiplication factor. For example, if the gametime
D setting is at x8 before you activate the >> button, it will read x16 after
  you have activated it. The maximum gametime rate is x32, where 32 seconds
R of gametime pass for every second of realtime. Right-clicking on >>
O (Shift-F8) immediately jumps the speed to maximum (x32) regardless of the
W current rate.
  
S This panel relates specifically to maneuvering your ship and studying the
K "field of battle". The panel is dominated by a map display, which fills the
I center and right end of the panel. To the far left are three banks of
D controls, related to: what telemetry is being displayed on the map;
  computer controlled autopilot navigation; and manual helm control.
R 
O 
W TELEMETRY
  
S This selects from which FW ship, if any, the sensor data displayed by the
K map comes. As each ship has a limited scanning range, the ability to
I display sensor information from any of your ships is of great strategic
D value as it allows you to "see" more than your ship's own sensors can.
  Furthermore, use of it allows you to see what any ship in your fleet is up
R to at any given moment.
O 
W The ship whose telemetry information is displayed is selected by using a
  scroller selector and an associated LOCK-OK (K) action button. Use the
S PageUp and PageDown buttons to scroll the list until the ship you want
K information from appears highlighted, and then activate LOCK-ON to have the
I map display that ship"s sensor information.
D 
  Just above the TELEMETRY controls is a small action button labeled MIX (X).
R The purpose of this button is to "mix" all received telemetry with the
O overall solar system map to produce a single "overview". Activating MIX
W causes any Lock-Ons to be disengaged and an entire solar system map to be
  displayed, allowing you to see where all of your forces are relative to the
S system's sun(s), planets, outposts, asteroid fields and waypoints. The mix
K mode map defaults to full-system view with a radius of 2 billion
I kilometers. The scale of the zoom can be changed using the map-scale
D controls (see the MAP description for details).
  
R Mix mode is useful for overall strategic planning, but it has some limits;
O particularly, it displays the locations of all known items in the system,
W but unknown items, such as enemy ships that are not in sensor range of any
  of your FW forces, are not displayed.
S 
K      NOTE:  If you are playing a game at beginner level, the map can always
I             display the current position of enemy ships, in sensor range
D             or not. This only works on beginner missions!
  
R 
O AUTOPILOT
W 
  The controls in this bank comprise your ship's autopilot and strategic
S scanners. The purpose of this bank is to allow you to pick targets, get
K information about them via scanning/probing, and move towards them. Above
I this bank's scroller selector is a value display and buttons which will act
D on the highlighted item in the selector. Below this bank's selector are a
  set of seven buttons which change what type of item is listed in the
R selector. All AUTOPILOT buttons and readouts dire listed as follows.
O 
W 
  PROBE (B)                                             
S 
K Scans the item highlighted in the AUTOPILOT scroller selector and provides
I information about it. When you probe each of the following subjects
D (selected using the buttons at the bottom of the AUTOPILOT controls), the
  indicated information is displayed:
R 
O 
W        STAR         Name, I.D. number, type and radius.
         ASTEROID     I.D. number and density.
S        WAYPOINT     I.D. number and range at time of probe.
K        OUTPOST      Name, I.D. number, alliance, status and
I                     sophistication.
D        PLANET       Name, I.D. number, type and radius.
         FW SHIP      Name, I.D. number, class, range and status
R                     (if destroyed)
O        ENEMY        I.D. Number, class, range and status.
W 
  When PROBE has been activated the scroller selector is replaced by the
S probe data, and the PROBE button itself changes to a NAV (V) button, which
K will restore the scroller selector to its normal status.
I 
D 
  CHASE (C) and INTRCPT (I)
R 
O These buttons activate the autopilot system, which immediately sets
W course to pursue the currently highlighted item in the Autopilot
  selector or the item currently being probed.
S 
K Only one of these two buttons can be activated at one time.
I 
D In CHASE mode, your ship will proceed at full-power until it approaches
  the target, and will then match velocity with it at a specified range
R 500,000 from starships, etc.). The chase mode is best used when
O pursuing moving targets, such as FW and enemy ships.
W 
  In INTRCPT mode, your ship will proceed at full-power until it ap-
S proaches the target, and will then slow to a complete stop within a
K specified range of it (500 kilometers from outposts, etc.). Once the
I interception has been completed, your ship remains stopped and will not
D automatically adjust its position if the target moves. The intercept
  function is most useful when pursuing (relatively) stationary targets,
R such as outposts, planets and asteroid fields.
O 
W The act of chasing or intercepting a particular target can be overridden
  or altered by activating any of the controls which affect the ship's
S heading and velocity, such as using the controls on HELM or the
K tactical maneuvering controls on the TACTICAL (303) panel.
I 
D Specific AUTOPILOT overrides work as follows:
  
R      - In chase mode, selecting CHASE again with a different subject
O        selected will change the course and target.
W      - In chase mode, activating INTRCPT (l) will alter the autopilot
         settings to intercept and stop relative to the current target or
S        a newly selected one.
K      - In intercept mode, selecting INTRCPT again with a different
I        subject selected will change the course and target.
D      - In intercept mode selecting CHASE will alter the autopilot set-
         tings to keep up active pursuit of the current target or a newly
R        selected one.
O      - In either mode, switching to manual helm control by using the
W        MANUAL (M), GET (G) or HALT (H) buttons on the HELM
         panel(see the HELM description below).
S      - Activating one of the tactical maneuvering controls on the
K        TACTICAL panel (303) will override any Autopilot or HELM
I        settings until you restore control to the NAVIGATION panel.
D 
  
R THE CHASE/INTERCEPT TARGET I.D.
O 
W This value display appears immediately to the right of the INTRCPT
  button. Its function is to list the I.D. number of the item
S last/currently being chased or intercepted. If either the CHASE or
K INTRCPT buttons are highlighted, the value in this readout indicates the
I current subject being pursued.
D 
  If the crosshair/tactical icon on the HELM is flashing (it will be
R static white in CGA), the CHASE and INTRCPT buttons will be off, however
O the I.D. readout still indicates the last subject being pursued,
W although the pursuit has been overridden by the tactical maneuvering
  controls. Disengaging the tactical maneuver in this case is accomplished
S either by using CHASE or INTRCPT to go after the same or a new target,
K activating manual helm control (see MANUAL, GET or HALT below),
I or by using the TACTICAL panel's small sextant button on the TACTIC
D control subset (see the section on panel 303 TACTICAL for details).
  
R If the manual helm controls (MANUAL, GET and HALT) are used, the
O autopilot is disengaged and the TARGET I.D. is cleared.
W 
  
S THE AUTOPILOT SELECTOR & BUTTONS
K 
I The AUTOPILOT selector works like all scroller selectors. This
D particular one displays I.D. numbers and names for seven different
  categories of lists, selected by the action buttons along the bottom of
R the selector.  Only one of these buttons can be active at any one time.
O 
W The buttons are:
  
S              STR (S)       Lists all stars (max of 2) in the system.
K              AFD (A)       Lists all asteroid fields in the system.
I              WAY (W)       Lists all waypoints in the system.
D              OUT (O)       Lists all outposts in the system.
               PLN (P)       Lists all planets in the system.
R              FWS (F)       Lists all FW starships in the system.
O              ENS (N)       Lists all enemy ships in sensor range of FW
W                            ships (in beginner mode all enemy ship are
                             listed).
S 
K 
I HELM
D 
  This bank of controls allows you to steer your ship, "manually" setting a
R course and velocity. This subpanel contains six action buttons, two
O navigational control status indicators, draggable "dial" and velocity meter
W controls, and several value readouts. The bank's MANUAL button must be
  active before most of these controls will do anything.
S 
K This is a sextant indicator light. The actual icon will remain black
I unless the Autopilot controls are active. If an AUTOPILOT mode is
D active, the icon will flash on and off to indicate that navigation
  control is currently under the autopilot (in CGA the icon turns white
R and does not flash).
O 
W This is a crosshair indicator light. The actual icon will remain black
  unless the TACTIC controls on the TACTICAL panel (303) are active.
S If the TACTIC controls are in use, this icon will flash on and off to
K indicate that navigation control is currently overridden by the tactical
I system (in CGA the icon turns white and does not flash).
D 
  
R MANUAL (M)
O 
W This action button activates manual helm control, making your ship take
  up the course and speed set using the Heading Dial and the Velocity
S Meter (see below). If the Autopilot controls ate active (noted by the
K flashing small sextant light), MANUAL shuts them off and takes control.
I If the TACTIC controls are active (noted by the flashing crosshair
D light), MANUAL takes control from them.
  
R You can manually change course or speed at any time by tweaking the
O controls in this section and activating MANUAL.
W 
  OPERATIONAL OVERVIEW: To utilize manual control you must set course and
S speed using the Heading Dial and Velocity meter and make sure that the
K MANUAL (M) (manual helm control) button has been activated.  Using the
I chase and intercept, or halt and tactical maneuvering controls, turns
D manual helm control off.
  
R The manual helm control mode is also automatically activated when the GET
O and HALT buttons are used (see below).
W 
  
S THE HEADING DIAL
K 
I This dial represents a heading in degrees, set relative to the "plane of
D the ecliptic" of the current solar system. Headings can be from 000 to
  359 degrees, allowing your ship to move in any direction on the map.
R Heading 000 is due "north" on the dial and map, heading 090 is due
O "east", 180 is due "south", and 270 is due "west".
W 
  The following is a breakdown of the elements of the Heading Dial.
S 
K   Current Heading Readout
I 
D      This displays the current heading of your ship. The value in this
       readout changes to reflect your ship's course changes. The
R      Current Heading Readout is not specifically linked to the
O      manual helm controls, and reflects the ship's heading whether
W      navigation is under autopilot, manual, or tactical control.
  
S   Desired Heading Readout
K 
I      This displays the desired heading you want your ship to take
D      when under manual helm control. The value displayed here is
       determined by the position of the Desired Heading Cursor (see
R      next item) on the outside of the Dial. When you set a new
O      desired heading this readout will change instantly to reflect it.
W      If MANUAL is activated, the Current Heading Readout (see
       above) will begin to change to match the desired heading as
S      your ship takes up the new course.
K 
I   Desired Heading Cursor
D 
       This operates much like the arrowhead pointer on a standard
R      "thermometer scale" (see "Part IV: The CCSI Interface"),
O      except that rather than going from one end of a straight scale to
W      another, this pointer circles a dial - encountering no start and end
       points. The position of the cursor on the outside of the dial
S      indicates your desired heading in degrees. The actual numerical value
K      of the heading is displayed in the Desired Heading Readout
I      (see above).
D 
       There are two ways to change the desired heading: dragging the
R      pointer, or using the Turn Clockwise and Turn Counter-Clockwise
O      controls (see below).
W 
       To drag the pointer you must have a compatible mouse. Click the left
S      mouse button on the pointer, and, while holding the button down,
K      "drag" the pointer around the dial to the desired position.  As you
I      move the pointer, the Desired Heading Readout will change to reflect
D      the new setting. When you release the mouse button, the pointer will
       stay where you left it.
R 
O   Turn Clockwise
W 
       This function is activated by the + button, and its purpose is to move
S      the Desired Heading Cursor around the Heading Dial in a clockwise
K      direction. When you activate the + button by clicking on it with the
I      mouse, it stays on only as long as you hold the mouse button down. If
D      using the keyboard, the button stays "on" and the pointer moves
       clockwise until you press another key.
R 
O   Turn Counter-Clockwise
W 
       This function is activated by the $ button, and its purpose is to
S      move the Desired Heading Cursor around the Heading Dial in a
K      counter-clockwise direction.
I 
D      When you activate the $ button by clicking on it with the mouse,
       it stays "on" only as long as you hold the mouse button down.
R      If using the keyboard, the button stays on and the pointer
O      moves counter-clockwise until you press another key.
W 
       NOTE: If the Velocity Meter (see below) is set to .000c your ship
S            will not be moving and your new Desired Heading setting won't
K            make a heck of a lot of difference.
I 
D 
  VELOCITY METER
R 
O This portion of the helm is where you can adjust your velocity for manual
W helm control situations. There are a number of items associated with the
  Velocity Meter.
S 
K VELOCITY NOTE: All velocities in Rules of Engagement are presented as
I metric values on scale where the number 1 equals the speed of light (c).
D Thus, a velocity of .75 equals 75% of lightspeed.
  
R Maximum Potential Velocity Readout
O 
W The symbol here is an arrow pointing at a "stop" line, which indicates that
  the number to the right of the symbol is your ship's maximum potential
S velocity. The maximum velocity is determined by the type of engines your
K ship carries. Smaller ships are limited in the size and power of engine
I types they can be equipped with.
D 
  This readout always represents the maximum velocity at which your ship
R could travel if the drive systems were undamaged. If the drive has
O sustained damage, you will not be able to reach this maximum until the
W drive is repaired.
  
S Velocity Range Scale
K 
I This is an "angled" version of the standard "thermometer" scale (see Part
D IV). It represents the potential velocity range of your vessel, going from
  "halted" (no velocity) at the bottom left, to your vessel's top velocity at
R the upper-right (the numeric value is displayed in the Maximum Potential
O Velocity Readout to the left). The position of the Desired Velocity Pointer
W (see next item) on this scale indicates the manual helm control velocity.
  
S Desired Velocity Pointer
K 
I This pointer is similar to pointers on standard "thermometer" scales (see
D Part IV). Its position along the Velocity Range Scale determines the
  desired velocity you want your ship to use when under manual helm control.
R 
O There are two ways to change the desired velocity; dragging the pointer up
W and down the sale using a mouse, or using the Increase and Decrease
  Velocity buttons (see below).
S 
K To drag the pointer you must have a compatible mouse. Click the left mouse
I button on the pointer, and, while holding the button down, "drag" the
D pointer up and down the scale to the desired position. When you release the
  mouse button, the pointer will stay where you left it and, if the MANUAL
R button is active, your ship will immediately begin making velocity
O adjustments. If in manual mode, you can see the velocity change happening
W by watching the Current Velocity Readout (see below).
  
S Increase Velocity Button
K 
I This function is activated by the UP button, and its purpose is to move the
D Desired Velocity Pointer up the Velocity Range Scale. When you activate the
  UP button by clicking on it with the mouse, it stays "on" only as long as
R you hold the mouse button down. If using the keyboard, the button stays
O "on" and the pointer attempts to move up the meter until you press another
W key.
  
S Decrease Velocity Button
K 
I This function is activated by the DOWN button, and its purpose is to move
D the Desired Velocity PointerDown the Velocity Range Scale. When you
  activate the DOWN button by clicking on it with the mouse, it stays "on"
R only as long as you hold the mouse button down. If using the keyboard, the
O button stays "on" and the pointer attempts to move down the meter until you
W press another key.
  
S Current Velocity Readout
K 
I This readout, appearing in a frame below the Desired Velocity Meter shows a
D continuously updated readout of your ship's current velocity. Under manual
  control or in intercept mode, the value will level off at a particular
R number. In chase or tactical maneuvering modes, the value will fluctuate as
O your 'ship automatically adjusts its position relative to targets.
W 
  
S HALT (H)
K 
I This button is of the trigger type, and causes your ship to execute a
D full-power breaking manuever and come to a complete stop (relative to the
  current solar system). Activating HALT automatically switches on manual
R helm control (MANUAL will be highlighted) and moves the Desired Velocity
O Pointer to 000. HALT overrides all chase, intercept, manual helm and
W tactical maneuvering controls.
  
S 
K GET (G)
I 
D This button is of the trigger type, and its function is to copy the current
  navigation settings into the HELM box and switch to manual helm control.
R The heading and velocity of your ship at the moment you trigger GET is set
O on the heading dial and velocity scales, regardless of whether
W navigational control is under autopilot (chase or intercept) or tactical
  control.
S 
K See Maneuvers in Part VI of this manual for examples of using this control
I in a mission.
D 
  
R THE MAP
O 
W This large display is used primarily for planning strategy and determining
  manual helm control settings. It displays either the telemetry data from
S the last ship selected using the LOCK-ON (K) button, or a "system overview"
K map if MIX (X) is active.
I 
D The view scale of the map is adjustable, allowing you to see large views
  for planning strategy or closing in to tighter zooms for viewing action in
R detail.
O 
W The map is made up of four elements: the map view itself; the item
  selection buttons; the view radius controls; and the horizontal and
S vertical coordinate scales.
K 
I The following is a breakdown of the elements of the map elements.
D 
  Map Display Area
R 
O This is where the actual map is displayed. The map is a square area the
W exact center and size of which is variable depending on a ship's position
  and sensor ability.
S 
K The map display can present views ranging from a minimum radius of 75
I kilometers to a maximum of 2 billion kilometers (the radius can be adjusted
D using the View Radius Controls, see below), although the 2 billion
  kilometer radius is available only in "mix" mode (see above).
R 
O View Radius Controls
W 
  These are along the map's left side, and their purpose is to allow you to
S adjust the map's "zoom" level to show varying volumes of space.
K 
I There are only three actual controls, all of which mouse users will
D probably have little use for (see Mouse Map Radius Control below).
  
R First and foremost is the zoom scale, which is simply a thermometer scale
O the full height of the map. This scale represents no "set" range, rather,
W the range it represents varies depending on the source of the telemetry. In
  mix mode it presents a range from 2 billion (top of the scale) to 75
S (bottom) kilometers. When Locked-Onto a ship, it represents a range from
K that ship's sensor-maximum (top) to 75 kilometers (bottom).
I 
D Alongside the zoom scale is a radius indicator an arrowhead type
  pointer which indicates where in the potential "zoom" range your view
R is currently set. If the arrowhead is halfway down the scale, your are
O currently viewing an area only half as large as potentially possible
W from the current telemetry source.
  
S The radius indicator is actually a control, and mouse users can "drag"
K it up and down the scale to adjust the view radius.
I 
D Keyboard users need to use the increase radius (+) and decrease radius (-)
  buttons at the top and bottom of the zoom scale. The + button causes the
R radius indicator to move up the scale, widening the view. Likewise, the (-)
O button causes the radius indicator to move down the scale, shrinking the
W view radius. As is typical with thermometer type scales, the (+) and (-)
  buttons activate an "accelerating movement" routine; the longer the button
S is active, the faster the radius indicator will move (see Part IV for
K details on Thermometer Scales and their operation).
I 
D Keyboard users must simply activate the buttons and then press any key when
  they wish to stop the radius indicator's motion. Mouse users who want to
R use these buttons must simply hold down the left mouse button for as long
O as they want the arrowhead to move.
W 
  Mouse Map Radius Control
S 
K If you are playing the game with a mouse, it is the easiest way to adjust
I the map radius. If you move the mouse pointer over the map itself, you'll
D see that a set of four "brackets" appear, framing an area of the map. As
  you move the mouse pointer you can adjust the size of the area framed.
R Clicking the left mouse button causes the map to instantly zoom in to show
O only the area you "framed". The VIEW RADIUS readout changes to reflect the
W radius of the area currently displayed. You can use this method of scaling
  in over and over again. The only time you can't zoom in on the map any more
S is when the view radius reaches 75 kilometers.
K 
I Backing "out" from a zoom involves the same technique, except that you use
D the right mouse button. When you right-click the mouse, the map changes
  its zoom level so that the area you were viewing when you clicked now fits
R inside the brackets. In effect, right-clicking does the reverse of
O left-clicking. Left-clicking blows up the area in the brackets to fill the
W map display, while right clicking shrinks the image filling the map to fit
  within the area defined by the brackets.
S 
K Horizontal & Vertical Coordinate Scales
I 
D These scales represents the entire "width" and "height" of the solar system
  map, from -2 billion to +2 billion. The mark at the middle of either scale
R represents coordinate 0, the center of the system on that axis. The
O arrowhead pointers which appear alongside each of these scales shows you
W where the current centered object is within the system. The specific
  coordinate the arrowheads point to are listed as the HORZ COORD: and VERT
S COORD: readouts.
K 
I      NOTE: These Coordinate Scales are readouts only, and you
D            cannot manually adjust the map center. Remember, the map
             center is always either a ship (Lock-On mode) or the system
R            center (mix mode).
O 
W Once you learn how the coordinate system works, such as that a # horizontal
  coordinate is to the right of system center and a - vertical coordinate is
S below the system center (on the map), then you can tell where a given ship
K is simply by Locking-Onto it and checking its coordinates. A ship with a
I horizontal coordinate of -2,000,000 (-2 million) and a vertical coordinate
D of 3,000,500,000 (3 billion, 500 million) would be just left of the
  system's center and 75% of the way towards the "south" end of the map from
R the system's center.
O 
W 
  ITEM SELECTION BUTTONS
S 
K Across the top of the map is one value readout, and eight action
I buttons. All but one of the buttons are used to select what items will
D appear in the map display.
  
R LOCK-ON I.D. READOUT
O 
W Between the MIX and PRJ buttons is a value redout which displays the
  identification number of the ship currently Locked-On to using the 
S TELEMETRY controls. This I.D. number will always be for a Federated World
K ship (F01 - F99).
I 
D If the MIX button is activated, this readout will display the word "MIX" to
  let you know that no single ship's telemetry is the source of the current
R map display.
O 
W PRJ (J)
  
S Immediately to the right of MIX and the LOCK-ON I.D. READOUT is the PRJ
K button, which toggles the "project course" mode on and off. When PRJ is
I active, an animated "blip" is drawn moving outward from the FW ship
D currently Locked-Onto as the telemetry source. This "blip" is used to show
  that vessel's current heading. The vessel whose course is being projected
R appears at the center of the map, and its I.D. number appears in the
O LOCK-ON I.D. READOUT (see above).
W 
  If MIX is active no projected course will be displayed, since no particular
S ship is the subject of a "mix" display.
K 
I 
D VIEW-ITEM SELECTOR BUTTONS
  
R The remaining seven buttons along the top of the map allow you to select
O which items you want the map to display at any given time. This is done to
W permit you to selectively display data relevant to your current operations.
  For instance, when tracking down enemy ships, you may not want solar system
S items (like planets, etc.) cluttering up the view.
K 
I These buttons are:
D 
  STR (R)      Displays all stars (max of 2) in the system.
R AFD (D)      Displays all asteroid fields in the system.
O WAY (Y)      Displays all waypoints in the system.
W OUT (U)      Displays all outposts in the system.
  PLN (L)      Displays all planets in the system.
S FWS (S)      Displays all FW starships in the system.
K ENS (E)      Displays all enemy ships in sensor range of
I 
D FW ships (in beginner mode all enemy ship are listed).
  
R The view-item buttons are not exclusive, and you can have none, all, or any
O combination of them active at any one time; such as having OUT, ENS and FWS
W switched on.
  
S 
K READING THE MAP
I 
D The map display is fairly easy to "read" and understand. Each type of item
  is identified by a symbol and always accompanied by an identification
R number. For instance, Federated Worlds starships are displayed as small
O green (white in CGA) vector symbols (arrows). The following chart shows the
W I.D. numbers, symbols and colors used for each type of item displayed on
  the map.
S 
K A few notes on map symbology:
I   - The vector/arrows representing ships are rather simple indicators of a
D     ship's actual heading. The vectors can point in one of eight
      directions, corresponding to headings of 0, 45, 90, 135, 180, 225,
R     270, and 3l5 degrees.  Actual headings can be any number between 0 and
O     359, so the vectors represent only "approximate" headings, not actual
W     ones.
  
S   - When a ship has been captured or destroyed, the symbol for it changes
K     from a vector to a small circle.
I 
D   - Planets appear as small filled circles until the map display zooms in
      tightly enough so that the planet's actual size can be accurately
R     reflected by an octagonal outline.
O 
W   - If several items are very close together on the map, sometimes the
      symbol or I.D. number for each may become obscured by those of other
S     items. This can be dealt with by changing the map's scale or by
K     choosing not to show certain items through use of the View Selection
I     Buttons (see above).
D 
  Furthermore, each system has a definite "border" which is exactly 2 billion
R kilometers out from the system center.  The map displays this "border" as a
O solid line, and your ship cannot cross it.  Built-in inhibitors prevent
W your ship from leaving the system and racing into empty interstellar space.
  The entire border can be seen in mix mode.
S 
K 
I SENSOR RANGE LIMITATIONS
D 
  Normally, the map displays the telemetry of the ship currently Locked-Onto
R (see TELEMETRY). Ships do not have infinite scanning range, and as a
O consequence when Locked-Onto a ship the map will display an area only as
W large as that ship's sensors can scan. In mix mode the map can display a
  view up to 2 billion kilometers in radius, but when viewing telemetry from
S a Destroyer equipped with the best equipment it can carry, the view is
K limited to 47 million kilometers in radius, about 1/43rd (2.35%) the map's
I maximum view radius (equivalent to an area representing a mere 5.5% of the
D map area). In mix mode sensor range limitations do not come into play
  insofar as the solar system components and your ships go, as you always
R know where they are. It is enemy forces that are the wildcard, and which
O are not displayed unless they happen to he within sensor range of one of
W your ships. Again, in beginner skill level games the location of all enemy
  ships can be determined at any time, as sensor range limits are disabled in
S beginner level.
K 
I 302 COMMUNICATIONS
D 
  This is the very heart of your feet command. It is from where you dispatch
R orders to and receive reports from the captains under your command.
O 
W The COMMUNICATIONS panel is one of the easiest to operate, having very
  simple controls. As you can see, it consists of three scroller selectors,
S one standard selector, and a handful of buttons and readouts. The panel is
K divided into two parts: the upper third is the Received Message section,
I and the lower two-thirds is the Dispatch Order section.
D 
  
R QUICK OPERATIONAL OVERVIEW
O 
W The COMMUNICATIONS PANEL has a number of options, but sending orders and
  reading received messages is fairly simple. Here's a quick reference for
S operating the panel:
K 
I To check to see if you have any waiting messages:
D    
  1.  From any panel other than COMMUNICATIONS, look
R     at the dish-antenna button on the 300 bar at the top of
O     the screen. If the number to the right of the icon is
W     greater than 00, then you have waiting messages. Use
      the icon to go to COMMUNICATIONS.
S 
K To review waiting messages:
I  
D 1.  Make sure you are on 302 COMMUNICATIONS.
  2.  The most recently received message will appear on the
R     highlighted line under the RECEIV MSG DISP label,
O     and a visual of the sender will appear to the right.
W 3.  To see previous messages, use the RIGHT to scroll back,
      highlighting each message and displaying its visual.
S     You can also use LEFT to go forward through the list.
K 
I To send an order to a single ship:
D 
  1.  If transmitting to an FW ship, make certain that FWS
R     (F) is highlighted under ORDER. If transmitting to an
O     enemy ship, highlight ENM (N).
W 2.  Use the LEFT and RIGHT buttons to highlight an order under
      ORDER.
S 3.  If the order you have selected requires you to pick an
K     item in the standard selector (bottom-right), highlight
I     the item in question using the mouse or by moving the
D     highlighter with the Home and End buttons.
  4.  Use the - and + buttons under SHIP to highlight the
R     name of the ship to which you want to send the order.
O 5.  Activate SEND ORDER (S).
W 
  To send an order to all ships of a given type:
S 
K 1.  If transmitting to an FW ship, make certain that FWS
I     (F) is highlighted under ORDER. If transmitting to an
D     enemy ship, highlight ENM (N).
  2.  Use the LEFT and RIGHT buttons to highlight an order under
R     ORDER.
O 3.  If the order you have selected requires you to pick an
W     item in the standard selector (bottom-right), highlight
      the item in question using the mouse or by moving the
S     highlighter with the Home and End buttons.
K 4.  Activate ALL (L).
I 
D 
  PANEL BREAKDOWN
R 
O The following is a breakdown of all of the sections, readouts and controls
W of panel 302 COMMUNICATIONS.
  
S This section is used to view the messages you have received. A scroller
K selector allows you to move through the messages, and a Vidcomm display
I shows you an image of the Captain, or enemy, who sent it.
D 
  The left end of this section consists of the scroller selector with which
R you can scan all messages (if any) received by your ship. As each message
O is received, it is placed at the "top" of the list, and pushes all other
W messages "down". The most recently received message is always at the top of
  the list.
S 
K Whenever you move to the COMMUNICATIONS panel from another, or if you
I receive a message while already in COMMUNICATIONS, the list is
D automatically set to the top so that you can immediately see the last
  message received.
R 
O SCROLL FORWARD/NEXT MESSAGE BUTTON
W 
  Activating this button UP will scroll up one item through the list of
S received messages, going from the message you are currently viewing to the
K next one received. If you are viewing the last message received, this
I button will have no effect.
D 
  SCROLL BACKWARD/PREVIOUS MESSAGE BUTTON
R 
O Activating this button DOWN will scroll down one item through the list of
W received messages, going from the message you are currently viewing to the
  previous one received. If you are viewing the first message received, this
S button will have no effect.
K 
I MESSAGE ORIGINATOR I.D.
D 
  This displays the I.D. number of the originator of the message on that
R line.
O 
W MESSAGE DISPLAY
  
S This displays the actual text of the messages. The highlighted line (top)
K is the currently selected message, the "visual" for which is displayed in
I the Vidcomm display to the far right.
D 
  MESSAGE TIMESTAMP DISPLAY
R 
O To the right of each message is it's timestamp, specifically, the time on
W the mission clock (CHRONO) when the message was transmitted, not the time
  when you received it.  Because of this, it is possible for messages to seem
S out of order because a message recently received from a very distant ship
K would have an earlier time stamp than a previously received message sent
I from a nearby ship.
D 
  BOOST BUTTON
R 
O The BOOST (B) button is a toggle which, when activated, overrides the
W power-level safety on your ship's communications circuits, so that the
  incoming signal strength is increased by from 1 to 15 points (depending on
S what communications system your ship carries). Using it carries a penalty,
K however, as it continually strains and damages your communications system.
I If you need it, it is recommended that you turn it on only when absolutely
D necessary (see next item).
  
R INCOMING & TRANSMIT SIGNAL STRENGTH METERS
O 
W To the immediate right of BOOST are the vertical "thermometer" scales, R
  and T. The left scale (R) shows you the strength of received/incoming
S signals. The strength of the last message received is indicated by the
K small green pointer (cyan in CGA) to the left of the scale. If a message is
I too weak to be received, or is blocked by system interference, a "MESSAGE
D GARBLED" alert appears in the MESSAGE DISPLAY, in which case you might want
  to use BOOST (see above) to try to enhance incoming signals so that you can
R read them.
O 
W The right scale (T) displays two pieces of related information. The red
  horizontal line indicates the estimated minimum level the outgoing signals'
S strength must reach in order to be properly received, and the cyan pointer
K shows the current actual signal strength of your communications system. If
I the pointer is above the line, then your transmitter is powerful enough to
D reach other ships in the system. If it is below the line, your transmitter
  is too weak to be received. If your transmissions are too weak to be
R received normally, as a last-ditch effort, you can use the EMERG PWR button
O to boost your transmitter strength (see EMERGENCY POWER BUTTON below).
W 
  VlDCOMM DISPLAY
S 
K Your vessel's communications equipment is of the classic Vidcomm variety,
I and in this portion of the panel a video "snapshot" of the sender of the
D currently highlighted message is displayed. This video image allows you to
  quickly identify the message's origin.
R 
O The Vidcomm display may sometime display varying amounts of static. The
W static is a result of the distance between ships and the level of stellar
  interference encountered by the ship transmitting the message (see next
S item).
K 
I INTERFERENCE METER
D 
  Stars are not simply light and heat sources for planets, they are vast
R thermonuclear reactors, radiating tremendous amounts of energy.
O Furthermore, stars are not all alike. Their size can vary tremendously, as
W can their chemical composition. There are six primary classes into which
  stars can fall, each identified by a letter; they are: B, A, F, G, K, and
S M. B class is the hottest star type, and M is the coolest. Hotter stars
K release more energy, and hence generate more energetic interference than
I coolers ones. (You can check the class of any stars in the current system
D by using PROBE on the 301 NAVIGATION panel.)
  
R Why is it important to know about star types? The more interference a star
O or stars generate, the more likely it is that your transmissions may be
W blocked. The INTERFER meter is a "thermometer" type scale representing the
  current level of interference generated by stellar bodies (stars) in the
S system. The yellow pointer (white in CGA) indicates the current
K interference level, and the red line represents the point at which the
I interference will impede transmissions. As long as the pointer is below the
D line, interference should not be a problem. If it is above the line, you
  may have problems transmitting orders.
R 
O If the arrowhead is below the line, then your transmissions may be blocked
W by the interference and a "BLOCKED" message will appear in the SENT readout
  at the bottom-left of the panel (see TRANSMITTER CHRONO below). Stellar
S interference is greater the closer you are to a star, so you can attempt to
K minimize its effects by navigating away from any stars. If the interference
I is still too great, you can attempt to use the EMERGENCY POWER BUTTON (next
D item).
  
R EMERGENCY POWER BUTTON
O 
W The EMERG PWR (E) button is a toggle which, when activated, overrides the
  power-level safety on your ship's transmitter, so that when you send a
S message, the signal strength is increased by 28 points. Emergency Power is
K used when the interference levels are so high that they impede
I transmissions from your ship (see above). When EMERG PWR is active, the
D communications system sustains six percentage points of damage every time
  you transmit an order.
R 
O The bulk of the COMMUNICATIONS panel is taken up by the controls you use
W for selecting and sending orders. To the left are two selectors, the first
  is used 10 select an order, and the second is for picking which ship to
S send the order to.  For some orders all you have to do is pick the order
K and ship, and then activate SEND ORD or ALL to transmit the order. For
I other orders, such as ATTACK ENEMY SHIP, the standard selector to the right
D becomes active, and you must specify another selection - such as which
  enemy ship to attack.
R 
O TO WHOM BUTTONS
W 
  These are toggle action buttons, one of which is always highlighted. If FWS
S (F) is selected, then the orders in the ORDER list below are those you can
K send to FW ships. If ENM (N) is selected, the orders that appear in the
I ORDER list are those you send to hostile spacecraft.
D 
  The SHIP selector is also affected by which of these buttons is
R highlighted. When FWS is highlighted, the SHIP selector lists FW ships, and
O when ENM is highlighted, it lists enemy ships.
W 
  ACKNOWLEDGE TOGGLE
S 
K ACKNOWLEDGE (K) is a selection button which lets you set whether or not you
I wish an "acknowledge order" flag to be transmitted with each message. If
D ACKNOWLEDGE is off, Captains may or may not send messages when they carry
  out orders. If it is on, you are telling them that you want them to
R acknowledge your orders and report on the status of their action as they
O carry those orders out. As always, some Captains may not respond to this.
W 
  PREVIOUS ORDER
S 
K The LEFT button scrolls up through the ORDER list to the order previous to
I the currently highlighted one (if any).
D 
  NEXT ORDER
R 
O The RIGHT button scrolls down through the ORDER list to the order
W immediately following the currently highlighted one (if any).
  
S ORDER LIST
K 
I This scroller selector allows you to scroll through the orders for the type
D of ship selected with the To Whom buttons. Three orders can be seen at any
  one time, and the one on the highlighted (white) line is the currently
R selected order. The list is scrolled using the LEFT and RIGHT buttons (see
O above).
W 
  A listing and description of all orders appears at the end of the section
S on the COMMUNICATIONS panel.
K 
I PREVIOUS SHIP
D 
  The - button scrolls up through the SHIP list to the ship previous to the
R currently highlighted one (if any).
O 
W NEXT SHIP
  
S The + button scrolls down through the SHIP list to the ship previous to the
K currently highlighted one (if any).
I 
D SHIP I.D.
  
R These fields list the I.D. numbers for the ships listed in the SHIP list to
O the right.
W 
  SHIP LIST
S 
K This scroller selector allows you to scroll through the list of ships of
I the type selected using the To Whom buttons (above). Three ship names can
D be seen at any one time, and the one on the highlighted (white) line is the
  currently selected order. The list is scrolled using the - and + buttons
R (see above).
O 
W If FWS is highlighted as the To Whom button, the names of all FW ships in
  the system can be scrolled through. If ENM is highlighted as the To Whom
S button, all enemy ships currently within sensor range of your forces will
K be listed (in beginner level missions all enemy ships will be listed).
I 
D REPORT STATUS TOGGLE
  
R This action button, ALL SHIPS REP STAT TO fi (A), is a toggle, which, when
O flipped on, automatically sends an order to all FW ships under your
W command, instructing their computers to transmit status reports to your
  ship's computer once every minute. The data transmitted by the ships
S appears on the Fleet STAT mode of panel 304 (see 304 DATA RETRIEVAL for
K details).
I 
D When you toggle this button off another order is sent, instructing all
  ships to discontinue sending minutely update reports.
R 
O Why would you possibly want this off? If your ships are constantly sending
W messages to you, the steady stream of transmissions makes it easier for
  enemy ships to track them down.
S 
K TRANSMITTER CHRONO
I 
D There are three time readouts displayed here. Any time you send a message
  to a single ship the readouts here are updated and tell you:
R 
O SENT     The time when you sent the last order.  It
W          reports "BLOCKED" if stellar interference is
           too strong and blocks your transmissions.
S 
K RECEIVE  The estimated time when the selected ship will
I          receive the last transmitted order.
D 
  EST ACK  The earliest time you could possibly expect an
R          acknowledgement message to the last transmitted
O          order (assuming the ACKNOWLEDGE toggle is on -
W          see above).
  
S SEND ORDER BUTTONS
K 
I There are two action buttons here, SEND ORD (S) and ALL (L). SEND ORD sends
D the currently highlighted order in the ORDER list to the ship highlighted
  in the SHIP list. It sends the order only to that ship, via a directional,
R coded transmission. On the other hand, ALL sends the currently highlighted
O order to every ship (of the type selected using the To Whom buttons) in the
W system.
  
S LIST HELP BUTTON
K 
I This is for keyboard users. The scroller selectors on this panel utilize
D the arrow keys that would normally be used to scroll a standard selector,
  like the one below this button. So, the standard selector on this panel
R uses the Home and End buttons to scroll the highlighter along the listing
O in the selector (if any). Because it's easy to forget these keys, LIST HELP
W (H) is provided. If you forget which keys to use, activating LIST HELP
  causes a box to appear, with a message reminding you of which keys move the
S highlighter.
K 
I SUBJECT I.D.
D 
  These list the I.D. numbers for all items currently listed in the selector.
R 
O SUBJECT NAME
W 
  This is a standard selector, which operates as any other standard selector
S (see Part IV).
K 
I KEYBOARD NOTE: Because the arrow keys are used elsewhere on this panel, to
D scroll the highlighter bar on this selector use the Home and End keys.
  
R What the selector lists, if anything, is not under direct player
O control.  Depending on the order highlighted, this selector may or may
W not display related items for your to chose. For example, the order
  "PATROL PLANETS" tells a ships to fly around the planets in the system,
S but does not name specific planets, and therefore the selector contains
K no selections. However, the order "CAPTURE OUTPOST" requires you to
I specify a target for the ships(s) you are commanding, and thus in this
D case the selector lists all outposts in the system.
  
R PREVIOUS PAGE
O 
W The PageUp button jumps to the previous "page" of items in the selector
  (if any).

***NOW CONTINUE READING PART II OF THIS DOC!*** 
